1*
CHAPTER FIRST.
THE LANDSCAPE OF THE STORY.
I SEE old Sylvester Peabodythe head of the
Peabody familyseated in the porch of his
country
dwelling, like an ancient patriarch, in the calm
of the morning. His broad-brimmed hat lies on the
bench at his side, and his venerable white locks flow
down his shoulders, which time in one hundred
seasons
of battle and sorrow, of harvest and drouth, of
toil and death, in all his hardy wrestlings with old
Sylvester, has not been able to bend. The old man's
form is erect and tall, and lifting up his head to its
height, he looks afar, down the country road which
leads from his rural door, towards the city. He has
kept his gaze in that direction for better than an
hour, and a mist has gradually crept upon his vision;
objects begin to lose their distinctness; they grow
dim or soften away like ghosts or spirits; the whole
landscape melts gently into a pictured dew before him.
Is old Sylvester, who has kept it clear and bright so
long, losing his sight at last, or is our common world,
already changing under the old patriarch's pure
regard
,
into that better, heavenly land?
It seemed indeed, on this very calm morning in
November, as if angels were busy about the Old
Homestead, (which lies on the map, in the heart of
one of the early states of our dear American Union,)
transforming all the old familiar things into
something
better and purer, and touching them gently
with a music and radiance caught from the very sky
itself. As in the innocence of beauty, shrouded in
sleep, dreams come to the eyelids which are the
realities of the day, with a strange lovelinessthe
fair country lay as it were in a delicious dreamy
slumber. The trees did not stand forth boldly with
every branch and leaf, but rather seemed gentle
pictures
of trees; the sheep-bells from the hills tinkled
softly and as if whispering a secret to the wind; the
birds sailed slowly to and fro on the air; there was
no harshness in the low of the herds, no anger in the
heat of the sun, not a sight nor a sound, near by nor
far off, which did not partake of the holy beauty
of the morning, nor sing, nor be silent, nor stand
still, nor move, with any other than a gliding
sweetness
and repose, or an under-tone which might have
been the echo here on earth, of a better sphere. There
was a tender sadness and wonder in the face of old
Sylvester, when a voice came stealing in upon the
silence. It did not in a single tone disturb the
heavenly
harmony of the hour, for it was the voice of
the orphan dependent of the house, Miriam Haven,
whose dark-bright eye and graceful form glimmered,
as though she were the spirit of all the softened
beauty of the scene, from amid the broom-corn,
where she was busy in one of the duties of the season.
Well might she sing the song of lament, for her
people
had gone down far away in the sea, and her
loverwhere was he?
Far awayfar away are they,
And I in all the world alone
Brightly, too brightly, shines the day
Dark is the land where they are gone!
I have a friend that's far away,
Unknown the clime that bears his tread;
Perchance he walks in light to-day,
He may be dead! he may be dead!
Like every other condition of the time, the voice
of Miriam too, had a change in it.
What wonder is this? said old Sylvester, I
neither hear nor see as I usedare all my senses
going
?
He turned, as he spoke, to a woman of small
stature, in whose features dignity and tenderness
mingled, as she now regarded him, with reverence
for the ancient head of the house. She came
forward
as he addressed her, and laying her hand
gently on his arm, said
You forget, father; this is the Indian summer,
which is the first summer softened and soberer, and
often comes at thanksgiving-time. It always changes
the country, as you see it now.
Child, child, you are right. I should have known
it, for always at this season, often as it has come to
me, do I think of the absent and the deadof times
and hours, and friends long, long passed away. Of
these whom I have known, he continued eagerly,
who have fallen in battle, in the toil of the field, on
the highway, on the waters, in silent chambers, by
sickness
,
by swords: I thank God they have all, all of
my kith and kin and people, died with their names
untouched with crime; all, he added with energy,
planting his feet firmly on the ground and rising as
he spoke sternly, all, save one alone, and he
He turned toward the female at his side, and when
he looked in her face and saw the mournful
expression
which came upon it, he dropped back into his
chair and stayed his speech.
At this moment a little fellow, who, with his flaxen
locks and blue eyes, was a very cherub in plumpness
and the clearness of his brow, came toddling out of the
door of the house, struggling with a basin of yellow
corn, which, shifting about in his arms, he just managed
to keep possession of till he reached old Sylvester's
knee. This was little Sam Peabody, the youngest of
the Peabodys, and as he looked up into his
grandfather's
face you could not fail to see, though they
grew so wide apart, the same story of passion and
character in each. The little fellow began throwing
the bright grain from the basin to a great strutting
turkey which went marching and gobbling up and
down the door-yard, swelling his feathers, spreading
his tail, and shaking his red neck-tie with a
boundless
pretence and restlessness; like many a hero he
was proud of his uniform, although the fatal hour
which was to lay him low was not far off. It was the
thanksgiving turkey, himself, in process of fattening
under charge of Master Sam Peabody. Busy in the
act, he was regarded with smiling fondness by his
mother, the widow Margaret Peabody, and his old
grandfather, when he suddenly turned, and said
Grand-pa, where's brother Elbridge?
The old man changed his countenance and
struggled
a moment with himself.
He had better know all, he said, after a pause of
thought, in which he looked, or seemed to look afar
off from the scene about him. Margaret, painful
though it be to you and to me, let the truth be
spoken. God knows I love your son, Elbridge, and
would have laid down my life that this thing had not
chanced, but the child asks of his brother so often,
and is so often evaded that he will be presently snared
in a net of falsehoods and deceptions if we speak not
more plainly to him.
An inexpressible anguish overspread the
countenance
of the widowed woman, and she turned aside
to breathe a brief prayer of trust and hope of strength
in the hour of trial.
The thanksgiving turkey, full of his banquet of
corn, strutted away to a slope in the sun by the
roadside
,
and little Sam Peabody renewed his question.
Can't I see brother Elbridge, grand-pa?
Never again, I fear, my child.
Why not, grandfather?
Answer gently, father, the widow interposed.
Make not the case too harsh against my boy.
Margaret, said the old man, lifting his
countenance
upon her with dignity of look, I shall speak
the truth. I would have the name of my race pure
of all stains and detractions, as it has been for an
hundred
years, but I would not bear hardly against your
son, Margaret. This child, innocent and unswayed as
he is, shall hear it, and shall be the judge.
Rising, old Sylvester with Margaret's help, lifted
the boy to the deep window-seat; and, standing on
either hand, the widow and the old man each at his
side, Sylvester taking one hand of the child in his,
began
My child, you are the youngest of this name and
household, to you God may have entrusted the
continuance
of our race and name, therefore thus early
would I have you learn the lesson your brother's
errors may teach.
That should come last, the widow interposed
gently. The story itself should teach it, if the story
be true.
Perhaps it should, Margaret, old Sylvester
rejoined
.
I will let the story speak for itself. It is,
my child, a year ago this day, that an excellent man,
Mr. Barbary, the preacher of this neighborhood,
disappeared
from among living men. He was
blameless
in his life, he had no enemy on the face of the
earth. He was a simple, frugal, worthy manthe
last time alive, he was seen in company with your
brother Elbridge, by the Locust-wood, near the pond
where you go to gather huckleberries in the summer,
and hazels in the autumn. He was seen with him
and seen no more.
But no man saw Elbridge, father, lift hand against
him, or utter an angry word. On the contrary, they
were seen entering the wood in close companionship,
and smiling on each other.
Even so, Margaret, said Sylvester, looking at
the child steadily, and waving his hand in silence
toward the widow. But what answer gave the
young man when questioned of the whereabout of
his friend? Not a word, Margaretnot a word, my
child.
Is Mr. Barbary dead, grandfather? the child
inquired
,
leaning forward.
How else? He is not to be found in pulpit or
field. No man seeth his steps any more in their
ancient
haunts. No man hearkens to his voice.
But the body, father, was never found. He may
be still living in some other quarter.
It was near the rock called High Point, you will
remember, and one plunge might have sent him to
the bottom. The under currents of the lake are
strong, and may have easily swept him away. There
is but one belief through all this neighborhood.
Ethan Barbary fell by the handAlmighty God,
that I should have to say it to you, my own
grandson
of
Elbridge Peabody.
The child sat for a moment in dumb astonishment,
glancing, with distended eyes and sweat upon his
brow, fearfully from the stern face of the old man to
the downcast features of the widow, when
recovering
speech he asked:
Why should my brother kill Mr. Barbary, if he
was his friend? Was not Elbridge always kind,
mother
?
I'm sure he was to me, and used to let me
ride old Sorrel before him to the mill!
Ever kind? He was. There was not a day he
did not make glad his poor mother's heart, with
some generous act of devotion to her. No sun set
on the day which did not cheer her lonely hearth
with a new light of gladness and peace from his
young eyes.
Margaret, you forget. He was soft of heart, but
proud of spirit, and haughty beyond his age; you
may not remember, even I could not always look
down his anger, or silence his loudness of speech.
Why should he kill Mr. Barbary? I will tell you,
child: the preacher, too, had discerned well your
brother's besetting sin, and, being fearless in duty,
from the Sabbath pulpit he spake of it plainly and
with such point that it could not fail to come home
directly to the bosom of the young man. This was
on the very Lord's day before Mr. Barbary
disappeared
from amongst us. It rankled in your brother's
bosom like poison; his passions were wild and
ungoverned
,
and this was cause enough. If he had
been innocent, why did Elbridge Peabody flee this
neighborhood, like a thief in the night?
Why did my brother Elbridge leave us, mother?
said the child, bending eagerly towards the widow,
who wrung her hands and was silent.
He may come back, said the child, shaking his
flaxen locks, and not abashed in the least by her
silence
.
He may come back yet and explain all to
us.
Never!
At that very moment a red rooster, who stood with
his burnished wings on the garden wall, near enough to
have heard all that had passed, lifted up his throat,
and poured forth a clear cry, which rang through the
placid air far and wide.
He willI know he will, said little Sam
Peabody
,
leaping down from his judgment-seat in the
window. Chanticleer knows he will, or he would
not speak in that way. He hasn't crowed once
before
,
you know, grandfather, since Elbridge went
away; we'll hear from brother soon, I know we shall
I know we shall!
The little fellow, in his glee, clapped his hands and
crowed too. The grandfather, looking on his
gambols
,
smiled, but was presently sad again.
Would to Heaven he may, he said. If they
come who should, to-day, we may learn of himfor
to-day my children should come up from all the
quarters of the land where they are scatteredthe
East, the West, the North, the Southto join with
me in the Festival of Thanksgiving which now draws
near. My head is whitened with many winters, and
I shall see them for the last time. Sylvester
continued
:
If they comein this calm season, which,
so soft and sweet, seems the gentle dawn of the
coming worldwe shall have, I feel, our last
re-gathering
on earth! But they come not; my eyes are
weary with watching afar off, and I cannot yet
discern
that my children bear me in remembrance, in
this grateful season of the year. Why do they not
come?
The aged patriarch of the family bowed his head
and was silent. From the broom-corn the gentle
voice stole again:
Why sings the robin in the wood?
For him her music is not shed:
Why blind-brook sparkle through the field?
He may be dead! he may be dead!
The murmur of Miriam's musical lamenting had
scarcely died away on the dreamy air, when there
came hurrying forward from the gardenwhere she
had been tending the great thanksgiving pumpkin,
which was her special chargethe black servant of
the household, Mopsey by name, who, with her
broad-fringed
cap flying all abroad, and her great eyes
rolling
,
spoke out as she approached
Do hear dat, massa?
I hear nothing, Mopsey.
Dere, don't you hear't now? Dey're coming!
With faces of curiosity, and ears erect, they
listened
.
There was a peculiar sound in the air, and
on closer attention they discerned, in the stillness of
the morning, the jingling traces of the stage-coach,
on the cross-road, through the fields.
They are not coming, said old Sylvester, when
the sound had died away in the distance; the stage
has taken the other road.
Dat may be, grandfather, Mopsey spoke up,
but for all dey may come. Ugly Davis, when
he
drive, don't always turn out of his way to come up
here. Dey may be on de corner.
As Mopsey spoke, two figures appeared on foot on
the brow of the road, which sloped down toward the
Homestead, through a feathery range of graceful
locusts
.
They were too far off to be distinctly made
out, but it was to be inferred that they were
travellers
from a distance, for one of them held against the
light some sort of travelling bag or portmanteau;
one of them was in female dress, but this was all they
could as yet distinguish. Various conjectures were
ventured as to their special character. They were
unquestionably making for the Homestead, and it
was to be reasonably supposed they were Peabodys,
for strangers were rare upon that road, which was
a by-way, off the main thoroughfare.
The family gathered on the extreme out-look of
the balcony, and watched with eager curiosity their
approach, which was slow and somewhat irregular
the man did not aid the woman in her progress, but
straggled on apart, nor did he seem to address her
as they came on.
CHAPTER SECOND.
ARRIVAL OF THE MERCHANT AND HIS PEOPLE.
It is William and Hannah, said the Patriarch,
towering above the household grouped about him,
and gaining an advantage in observation from his
commanding height, I am glad the oldest is the
first to come!
When the two comers reached the door-yard gate
the man entered in without rendering the least
assistance
or paying the slightest heed to his companion,
who followed humbly in his track. He was some
sixty years of age, large-featured and inclining to
tallness; his dress was oldmanish and plain,
consisting
of a long-furred beaver hat, a loose made coat,
and other apparel corresponding, with low cut shoes.
He smiled as he came upon the balcony, greeting
old Sylvester with a shake of the hand, but taking
no notice whatever either of the widow, little Sam,
or Mopsey. His wife, on the contrary, spoke to all,
but quietly and submissively, which was in truth,
her whole manner. She was spare and withered,
with a pinched, colorless face, constrained in a scared
and apprehensive look as though in constant dread
of an impending violence or injury. Over one eye
she wore a green patch, which greatly heightened
the pallor and strangeness of her features.
Where's the Captain and Henrietta? old
Sylvester
asked when the greetings were over.
They started from the city in a chay, he was
answered by William Peabody, some hours before
us,the captain,seamanway of driving irreg'lar.
Nobody can tell what road he may have got into.
Should'nt be surprised if did'nt arrive till
to-morrow
morning. Will always have high-actioned
horse.
William Peabody had scarcely spoken when there
arose in the distance down the road, a violent cloud
of dust, from which there emerged a two-wheeled
vehicle at a thundering pace, and which, in less than
a minute's time, went whirling past the Homestead.
It was supposed to contain Captain Saltonstall and
wife; but what with the speed and dust, no eye
could have guessed with any accuracy who or what
they were. In less than a minute more it came
sweeping back with the great white horse, passing
the house again like an apparition, or the ghost of a
2
horse and gig. With another sally down the road
and return, with a long curve in the road before the
Homestead, it at last came to at the gate, and
disclosed
in a high sweat and glowing all over his huge
person, the jovial Captain, and at his side his pretty
little cherry-faced girl of a wife, Henrietta Peabody,
daughter of William Peabody, who, be it known, is
old Sylvester's oldest son. There also emerged from
the one-horse gig, after the captain had made ground,
and jumped his little wife to the same landing in his
arms, a red-faced boy, who must have been closely
stowed somewhere, for he came out of the vehicle
highly colored, and looking very much as if he had
been sat upon for a couple of hours or more. The
Captain having freed his horse from the traces, and
at old Sylvester's suggestion, set him loose in the
door-yard to graze at his leisure, rushed forward upon
the balcony very much in the character of a good
natured tornado, saluted the widow Margaret with a
whirlwind kiss, threw little Sam high in the air and
caught him as he came within half an inch of the
ground, shook the old grandfather's readily extended
hand with a sturdy grasp, and wound up, for a
moment
,
with a great cuff on the side of the head with
a roll of stuff for a new gown for Mopsey, saying as
he delivered it, Dere, what d'ye say to dat, Darkey!
Darkey brightened into a sort of nocturnal
illumination
,
and shuffling away, in the loose shoes, to the
keeping of which on her feet the better half of the
best energies of her life were directed, gave out that
she must be looking after dinner.
It was but for a moment only that the Captain
paused, and in less than five minutes he had said and
done so many good-natured things, had shown
himself
so free of heart withal, and so little considerate
of self or the figure he cut, that in spite of his great
clumsy person, and the gash in his face, and the
somewhat exorbitant character of his dress, his coat
being a bob as long and straight in the line across
the back, as the edge of a table, you could not help
regarding him as a decidedly well made, well dressed,
and quite handsome person; in fact the Captain
passed with the whole family for a fine-looking man.
Where's my little girl Miriam? asked the jovial
Captain, after a moment's rest in a seat by the side
of old Sylvester. I must see my Dolphin, or she'll
think I'm growing old.
Being advised that the young lady in question
was somewhere within, the Captain rushed into the
house, pursued by all the family in a body, save
William
Peabody, who remained with old Sylvester,
seated
and in silence.
How go matters in the city, William? he said,
removing his hand from his brow, where it had rested
in contemplation for several minutes.
After the old fashion, father, William Peabody
answered, smiling with a fox-like glance at his father;
added three new houses to my property since last
year.
Three new houses?
Three, all of brick,good streetsbuilt in the
latest style. The city grows and I grow!
Three new houses, and all in the latest style
and how does Margaret's little property pay?
Poorly, father, poorly. Elbridge made a bad
choice when he bought itgreatly out of repair
rents come slowly.
In a word, the old story, the widow gets nothing
again from the city. I had hopes you would be able
to bring her some returns this time, for she needs it
sadly.
I do the best I can, but money's not to be got
out of stone walls.
And you have three new houses which pay well,
old Sylvester continued, turning his calm blue eye
steadily upon his son.
Capitalbest in the city! Already worth twice
I gave for 'em. The city grows and I grow!
My son, do you never think of that other house
reserved for us all?
William Peabody was about to answer, it was
nonsense
for a man only sixty and in sound condition of
body and mind to think too much of that, when his
eye, ranging across the fields, espied in shadow as it
were, through the dim atmosphere, the mist clearing
away a little in that direction, an old sorrel horsea
long settler with the family and well-known to all its
membersstaggering about feebly in a distant
orchard
,
and in her wanderings stumbling against the
trees.Is old Sorrel blind? he asked, shading his
own eyes from the light.
She is, William, old Sylvester replied; her
sight went from her last New-Year's day.
My birth-day, said the merchant, a sudden pallor
coming upon his countenance.
Yes, you and old Sorrel are birth-mates, my son.
We are; she was foaled the day I was born, said
William Peabody, and added, as to himself,
musingly
,
Old Sorrel is blind! So we passso we pass
young to-dayto-morrow oldlimbs fail ussight
is gone.
They sat silently, contemplating the still morning
scene before them, and meditating, each in his own
particular way, on the history of the past.
To William, the merchant, it brought chiefly a
recollection
how in his early manhood he had set out
from those quiet fields for a hard struggle with the
world, with a bare dollar in his pocket, and when
that was gone the whole world seemed to combine in
a desperate league against him to prevent his
achieving
another. How at last, on the very edge of
starvation
and despair, he had wrung from it the means
of beginning his fortunes; and how he had gone on
step by step, forgetting all the pleasant ties of his
youth, all recollections of nature and cheerful faces
of friends and kinsfolk, adding thousand to thousand,
house to house; building, unlike Jacob, a ladder, that
descended to the lower world, up which all harsh and
dark spirits perpetually thronged and joined to drag
him down; and yet he smiled grimly at the thought
of the power he possessed, and how many of his early
companions trembled before him because he was
grown to be a rich man.
Old Sylvester, on the other hand, in all his memory
had no thought of himself. His recollection ran back
to the old times when his neighbors sat down under a
king's sceptre in these colonies, how that chain had
been freed, the gloomy Indian had withdrawn his
face from their fields, how the darkness of the woods
had retired before the cheering sun of peace and
plenty; and how from a little people, his dear
country
,
for whose welfare his sword had been stained,
had grown into a great nation. Scattered up and
down the long line of memory were faces of friends
and kindred, which had passed long ago from the
earth. He called to mind many a pleasant fire-side
chat; many a funeral scene, and burying in sun-light
and in the cold rain; the young Elbridge too was in
his thoughts last of all; could he return to them with
a name untainted, the old man would cheerfully lie
down in his grave and be at peace with all the world.
In the meanwhile, within the house the Captain in
high favor was seated in a great cushioned arm-chair
with little Sam Peabody on his knee, and the women
of the house gathered about him, looking on as he
narrated the courses and adventures of his last
voyage
.
The widow listened with a sad interest.
Mopsey
rolled her eyes and was mirthful in the most
serious
and stormiest passages; while little Sam and the
Captain's wife rivalled each other in regarding the
Captain with innocent wonder and astonishment, as
though he were the most extraordinary man that
ever sailed the sea, or sat in a chair telling about it,
in the whole habitable globe. Miriam Haven alone
was distant from the scene, gliding to and fro past
the door, busied in household duties in a neighboring
apartment, and catching a word here and there as she
glanced by.
It was a wonderful story, certainly, the Captain was
telling, and it seemed beyond all belief that it could
be true that one man could have seen the whales, the
icebergs, the floating islands, the ships in the air, the
sea-dogs, and grampuses, the flying-fish, the pirates,
and the thousand other wonders the Captain reported
to have crossed his path in a single trip across the
simple Atlantic and back. He also averred to have
distinctly seen the sea-serpent, and what was more,
to have had a conversation with a ship in the very
middle of the ocean. Was there anything
wonderful
in that? it occurs every daybut listen to the
jovial Captain!a shipand he had news to tell
them of one they would like to hear about. They
pressed close to the Captain and listened breathlessly;
Miriam Haven pausing in her task, and stopping
stone-still like a statue, in the door, while her very
heart stayed its beating.
Go onCaptaingo ongo on!
Well, what do you think; we were in latitude
no matter, you don't care about thatwe had just
come out of a great gale, which made the sea
pitch-dark
about us; when the first beam of the sun
opened the clouds, we found ourselves along side a
ship with the old stars and stripes flying like a bird
at the mast-head. There was a sight, my hearties.
We hailed her, she hailed us, we threw her papers,
she threw us, and we parted forever.
Is that all?
Not half. One of these was a list of passengers;
I run my eye up, and I run my eye down, and there,
shining out like a star amongst them all, I find,
whose d'ye thinkElbridge Peabodyas large as life.
2*
Miriam Haven staggered against the door-post,
the widow fell upon her knees, Thank God, my
boy is heard from.
Little Sam Peabody darted from the Captain's
knee and rushed upon the balcony, crying at the top
of his lungs, Grandfather, brother Elbridge is heard
from.
I don't believe it, said William Peabody; the
poor old blind sorrel had disappeared from sight into
a piece of woods near the orchard, and the merchant
had quite recovered his usual way of speaking.
Never will believe it. You hav'nt heard of that
youngster,never will. Always knew he would run
away some daynever come back again.
The Captain's story was rapidly explained by the
different members of the family, who had followed
little Sam, to repeat it to old Sylvester, each in her
own way. Miriam and Hannah Peabody, who at
sound of the commotion had come forth from an
inner chamber, whither she had been retired by
herself
,
joined the company of lookers on.
What all amount to, he continued, in his
peculiar
clipped style of speech, Expect to see him
again, do you. Mighty fine chancewhere going
to?
The Captain couldn't tell.
One of the Captain's fine storiesnonoif
that boy ever comes back again, I'll
There was a deep silence to hear what the hard
old merchant proposed.
I'll hand over to him the management of his
late father's property, he was always hankering after,
and thought he could make so much more of than
his hard-fisted old uncle.
This was a comfortable proposition, and little Sam
Peabody, as though it were a great pear or red
pippin
that was spoken of, running to his mother, said,
Mother, I'd take it.
I do, said the widow, and call you all to
witness.
William Peabody smiled grimly on Margaret; his
countenance darkened suddenly, and he was, no
doubt, on the point of retracting his confident offer,
when his wife uttered in an under tone, half entreaty,
half authority, William, at the same time turning
on her husband the side of the countenance which
wore the green shade. He stifled what he intended
to utter, and shifting uneasily in his seat, he looked
toward the city and was silent. Whatever the
reason
,
it was clear that when they were seated at the
table, partaking of the meal, it was Captain
Saltonstall
that had the best attention from every member
of the household, (and the best of the dish,) from
all save old Sylvester, who held himself erect, as
usual, and impartial in the matter.
The ways of Providence are strange, said old
Sylvester, Out of darkness he brings marvellous
light, and from the frivolous acorn he spreads the
branches wide in the air, which are a shelter, and a
solace, and a shadowy play-ground to our youth and
old age. We must wait the issue, and whatever
comes, to Him must we give thanks.
With this sentiment for a benediction, the
patriarch
dismissed his family to their slumbers, which to
each one of the household brought its peculiar train
of speculation; to two, at least, Miriam and the
widow Margaret, they brought dreams which only
the strong light of day could disprove to be realities.
CHAPTER THIRD.
THE FARMER-FOLKS FROM THE WEST.
With
the following day, (which was calm, gentle,
and serene as its predecessor,) a little after the
dispatch
of dinner, the attention of the household was
summoned to the clatter of a hurrying wagon, which,
unseen, resounded in the distant country. Old
Sylvester
was the first to hear itfaintly at first, then it
rose on the wind far off, died away in the woods and
the windings of the roads, then again was entirely
lost for several minutes, and at last growing into a
portentous rattle, brought to at the door of the
homestead
,
and landed from its ricketty and bespattered
bosom Mr. Oliver Peabody, of Ohio; Jane his wife,
a buxom lady of fair complexion, in a Quaker
bonnet
;
and Robert, their eldest son, a tall, flat-featured
boy, some thirteen years of age.
The countryman in a working shirt, who had the
control of the wagon, and who had been beguiled by
Oliver some five miles out of his road home, (to which
he was returning from the market town,) under
pretence
of a wish to have his opinion of the cropsthe
poor fellow being withal a hired laborer and never
having owned, or entertained the remotest speculation
of owning, a rood of ground of his own,with a
commendation
from Oliver, delivered with a cheerful
smile, that his observations on timothy were very
much to the purpose, drove clattering away again.
Mr. Oliver Peabody, farmer, who had come all the
way from Ohio to spend thanksgiving with his old
fatherof a ruddy, youthful and twinkling
countenance
who
wore his hair at length and unshorn,
and the chief peculiarity of whose dress was a grey
cloth coat, with a row of great horn-buttons on either
breast, with enormous woollen mittens, brought his
buxom wife forward under one arm with diligence,
drawing his tall youth of a son after him by the other
handthrew himself into the bosom of the Peabody
family, and was heartily welcomed all round. He
didn't say a word of half-horses and half-alligators,
nor of greased lightning, although he was from the
West, but he did complain most bitterly of the
uncommon
smoothness of the roads in these parts, the
short grass, and the 'bominable want of elbow-room
all over the neighborhood. It was with difficulty he
could be kept on the straitened stage of the balcony
long enough to answer a few plain questions of
children
and other matters at home; and immediately
expressed an ardent desire to take a look at the
garden.
We got somefin' to show thar, Mas'r Oliver,
said Mopsey, who had stood by listening, with open
mouth and eyes, to the strong statements of the
western farmer, we haint to be beat right-away no
how!
Old Sylvester rose with his staff, which he carried
more for pleasure than necessity, and led the way.
As they approached there was visible through all the
plants, shrubs and other growths of the place,
whatever
they might bea great yellow sphere or ball,
so disposed, on a little slope by itself, as to catch the
eye from a distance, shining out in its golden hue
from the garden, a sort of rival to the sun himself,
rolling overhead.
Dere, what d'ye tink of dat, Oliver, Mopsey
asked, forgetting in the grandeur of the moment all
distinctions of class or color, I guess dat's
somefin
.
That's a pumpkin, said Mr. Oliver Peabody,
calmly.
Yes, I guess it is
de tanksgivin punkin!
She looked into the western farmer's face, no doubt
expecting a spasm or convulsion, but it was calm
calm as night. Mopsey condescended not another
word, but walking or rather shuffling disdainfully
away, muttered to herself, Dat is de very meanest
man, for a white man, I ever did see; he looked at
dat 'ere punkin which has cost me so many
anxious
days and sleepless nightswhich I have watched
over as thoughf it had been my own childwhich I
planted wid dis here hand of my own, and fought for
agin the June bugs and the white frost, and dat mouse
dat's been tryin to eat it up for dis tree weeks and
betterjust as if it had been a small green
cowcumber
.
I don't believe dat Oliver Peabody knows it is
tanksgivin'. He's a great big fool.
I see you still keep some of the old red breed,
father, said Oliver when they were left alone in the
quiet of the garden, pointing to the red rooster, who
stood on the wall in the sun.
Yes, old Sylvester answered, for old times'
sake. We have had them with us now on the farm
for better than a hundred years. I remember the day
the great grandfather of this bird was brought among
us. It was the day we got news that good David
Brainard, the Indian missionary, diedthat was some
while before the revolutionary war. He died in the
arms of the great Jonathan Edwards, at
Northampton
;
their souls are at peace.
I recollect this fellow, Oliver continued,
referring
to the red rooster, When I was here last he
was called Elbridge's bird, that was the year before
last.
There is no Elbridge now, said the old
grandfather
.
I know all, said Oliver, I had a letter from
Margaret, telling me the story and begging me to
keep a watch for her boy.
A wide watch to keep and little to be got by it,
I fear, old Sylvester added.
Not altogether idle, perhaps; we have sharp eyes
in the West and see many strange things. Jane is
confident she saw our Elbridge, making through
Ohio, but two months after he left here; he was
riding
swiftly, and in her surprise and suddenness she
could neither call nor send after him.
You did not tell us of that, said the old man.
No, I waited some further discovery.
Be silent now, you may easily waken hopes to be
darkened and dashed to the ground. Which way
made the boy?
Southward.
During this discourse, as though he distinguished
the sound of his young master's name and knew to
what it related, Chanticleer walked slowly, and as if
by accident or at leisure, up and down the
garden-wall
,
keeping as near to the speakers as was at all
seemly. When they stopped speaking he leaped
gently to the ground and softly clapped his wings.
A moment after there came hurrying into the
garden, in a wild excitement, and all struggling to
speak first, little Sam Peabody in the lead, Robert,
the flat-featured youth of thirteen, and Peabody
Junior, (who, it should be mentioned, having found his
way into a pantry a couple of minutes after his
arrival
with the Captain, and appropriated to his own
personal use an entire bottle of cherry brandy, had
been straightway put to bed, from which he had now
been released not more than a couple of hours), and
to announce as clamorously as they respectively
could, that Brundage's Bull had just got into our
big meadow.
Nobody hurt? asked old Sylvester.
Nobody hurt, grandfather, but he's ploughing
up the meadow at a dreadful rate, said little Sam
Peabody.
Like wild, Peabody Junior added.
This statement, strongly as it was made, seemed
to have no particular effect on old Sylvester. Oliver
Peabody, on the other hand, was exceedingly
indignant
,
and was for proceeding to extremities
immediately
,
the expulsion of the Brundage bull, and the
demanding of damages for allowing his cattle to cross
the boundary line of the two farms.
Old Sylvester listened to his violence with a blank
countenance; nor did he seem to comprehend that
any special outrage had been committed, for it must
be acknowledged that the only indication that the
grandfather had come to his second childhood was,
that, with his advancing years, and as he
approached
the shadow of the other world, he seemed to have
lost all idea of the customary distinctions of rank
and property, and that very much like an old
apostle
,
he was disposed to regard all men as brethren,
and boundary lines as of very little consequence.
He therefore promptly checked his son Oliver in
his heat, and discountenanced any further proceedings
in the matter.
Brundage, he said, would, if he cared about
him, come and take his bull away when he was
ready; we are all brethren, and have a common
country, Oliver, he added, I hope you feel that
in the West, as well as we do here.
Thank God, we have, Oliver rejoined with
emphasis
,
and we love it!
I thank God for that too, old Sylvester replied,
striking his staff firmly on the ground, I remember
well, my son, when your great state was a wilderness
of woods and savage men, and now this common
skylook at it, Oliverwhich shines so clearly above
us, is yours as well as ours.
I fear me, father, one day, bright, beautiful, and
wide-arched as it is, the glorious Union may fall,
said Oliver, laying his hand upon an aged tree which
stood near them, may fall, and the states drop, one
by one away, even as the fruit I shake to the ground.
As though he had been a tower standing on an
elevation, old Sylvester Peabody rose aloft to his full
height, as if he would clearly contemplate the far past,
the distant, and the broad-coming future.
The Union fall! he cried. Look above, my
son! The Union fall! as long as the constellations
of evening live together in yonder sky; look down,
as long as the great rivers of our land flow eastward
and westward, north and south, the Union shall stand
up, and stand majestical and bright, beheld by ages,
as these shall be, an orb and living stream of glory
unsurpassable.
The children were gathered about, and watched with
eager eyes and glowing cheeks, the countenance of
the grandfather as he spoke.
No, no, my son, he added, there's many a true
heart in brave Ohio, as in every state of ours, or they
could not be the noble powers they are.
While old Sylvester spoke, Oliver Peabody
wrenched
with some violence, from the tree near which they
stood, a stout limb, on the end of which he employed
himself with a knife in shaping a substantial knob.
What weapon is that you are busy with, Oliver?
old Sylvester asked.
It's for that nasty bull, Oliver replied. I would
break every bone in his body rather than let him
remain
for a single minute on my land; the
furtherance
of law and order demands the instant
enforcement
of one's rights.
You are a friend of law and order, my son.
I think I am, Oliver answered, standing erect
and planting his club, in the manner of Hercules in
the pictures, head down on the ground.
I hope you are, Oliver; but I fear you forget the
story I used to tell of my old friend Bulkley, of
Danbury
,
who, being written to by some neighboring
Christians who were in sore dissension, for
advisement
,
gave them back word:Every man to look
after his own fence, that it be built high and strong,
and to have a special care of the old Black Bull;
meaning thereby no doubt, our own wicked passions;
that is the true Christian way of securing peace
and good order.
Oliver threw his great trespass-club upon the
ground, and was on the point of asking after an old
sycamore, the largest growth of all that country,
which, standing in a remote field had, in the
perilous
times sheltered many of the Peabody family in
its bosomwhen he was interrupted by the sudden
appearance of Mopsey in a flutter of cap-strings,
shuffling
shoes, and a flying color in her looks of at least
double the usual depth of darkness. It was just
discovered
that the poultry-house had been broken into
over night, and four of the fattest hens taken off by
the throat and legs, besides sundry of the inferior
members of the domicile; as wicked a theft, Mopsey
said, as ever was, and she hadn't the slightest
hesitation
in charging it on them niggers in the Hills, (a
neighboring settlement of colored people, who lived
from hand to mouth, and seemed to be fed, like the
ravens by some mystery of providence.)
Oliver Peabody watched closely the countenance
of the patriarch, not a little curious to learn what
effect this announcement would have upon his
temper
.
This is all our own fault, said old Sylvester,
promptly. We should have remembered this was
thanksgiving time, and sent them something to stay
their stomachs. Poor creatures, I always wondered
how they got along! Send 'em some bread,
Mopsey
,
for they never can do anything with fowls
without
bread!
Send 'em some bread! Mopsey rejoined,
growing
blacker and more ugly of look as she spoke:
Send 'em whips, and an osifer of the law!the four
fattest of the coop.
Never mind, said old Sylvester.
Six of the ten'drest young'uns!
Never mind that, said old Sylvester.
I'd have them all in the county jail before
sundown
,
urged Mopsey.
Oliver, we will go in to tea, continued the
patriarch
.
We have enough for tea, Mopsey?
Yes, quite enough, Mas'r.
Then, cried the old man, striking his staff on the
ground with great violence, rising to his full height,
and glowing like a furnace, upon Mopsey, then, I
say, send 'em some bread!
This speech, delivered in a voice of authority, sent
Mopsey, shuffling and cowering, away, without a
word, and brought the sweat of horror to the brow of
Oliver, which he proceeded to remove with a great
cotton pocket-handkerchief, produced from his coat
behind, on which was displayed in glowing colors, by
some cunning artist, the imposing scene of the
signers
of the Declaration of Independence getting ready
to affix their names. Mr. Oliver Peabody was the
politician of the family, and always had the
immortal
Declaration of Independence at his tongue's end,
or in hand.
CHAPTER FOURTH.
THE FORTUNES OF THE FAMILY CONSIDERED.
When
Oliver and old Sylvester entered the house
they found all of the family gathered within, save
the children, who loitered about the doors and
windows
,
looking in, anxious-eyed, on the preparations
for tea going forward under the direction of the
widow Margaret, and Mopsey. The other women of
the household were busy with a discussion of the
merits of Mrs. Carrack, of Boston, the fashionable
lady of the family.
I should like to see Mrs. Carrack above all
things, said the Captain's pretty little wife, she
must be a fine woman from all I have heard of her.
Thee will have small chance, I fear, child,
said Mrs. Jane Peabody, sitting buxomly in an easy
arm chair, which she had quietly assumed, she is
too fine for the company of us plain folks in every
point of view.
It's five years since she was here, the widow
3
suggested as she adjusted the chairs around the table,
she said she never would come inside the house
again, because the best bed-chamber was not given
to herI am sorry to say it.
She's a heathen and wicked woman, Mopsey
said, shuffling at the door, and turning back on her
way to the kitchenyour poor boy was lying low
of a fever and how could
she
expect it.
In one point of view she may come; her husband
was living then, continued Mrs. Jane Peabody,
she has become a rich woman since, and may honor
us with a visitto show us how great a person she has
got to belet her comeit need'nt trouble thee, nor
me, I'm sure. Mrs. Jane Peabody smoothed her
Quaker vandyke, and sat stiffly in her easy chair.
Old Sylvester entering at that moment, laid aside
his staff and broad-brimmed hat, which little Sam
Peabody ran in to take charge of, and took his seat
at the head of the table; the Captain, who was busy
at the back-door scouring an old rusty fowling-piece
for some enterprise he had in view in the morning,
was called in by his little wife; the others were
seated
in their places about the board.
Where's William? old Sylvester asked.
He was at a window in the front room, where he
had sat for several hours, with spectacles on his brow,
poring over an old faded parchment deed, which
related to some neighboring land he thought
belonged
to the Peabodys, (although in possession of others,)
and which he had always made a close study of on
his visits to the homestead. There was a dark
passage
,
under which he made their title, which had
been submitted to various men learned in the law;
it was too dark and doubtful, in their opinion, to
build a contest on, and yet William Peabody gave it
every year a new examination, with the hope,
perhaps
,
that the wisdom of advancing age might
enable him to fathom and expound it, although it
had been drawn up by the greatest lawyer of his
day in all that country. His wife Hannah, grieving
in spirit that her husband should be toiling forever in
the quest of gain, sat near him, pale, calm and
disheartened
,
but speaking not a word. He could not
look at her with that fearful green shade on her face,
but kept his eyes always fixed on the old parchment.
When his aged father had taken his seat, and began
his thanks to God for the bounties before them, as
though the old Patriarch had brought a better spirit
from the calm day without, he thrust the paper into
his bosom and glided to his place at the table. It
would have done you good to hear that old man's
prayer. He neither solicited forgiveness for his
enemies nor favors for his friends; for schools,
churches, presidents or governments; neither for
health, wealth, worldly welfare, nor for any single
other thing; all he said, bowing his white old head,
was this:
May we all be Christian people the day we die
God bless us.
That was all; and his kinsfolk lost no appetite in
listening to itfor it was no sooner uttered than they
all fell toand not a word more was spoken for five
minutes at least, nor then perhaps, had not little Sam
Peabody cried out, with breathless animation, and
delight of feature,
The pigeons, grandfather! at the same time
pointing from the door to the evening sky, along
which they were winging their calm and silent flight
in a countless trainstreaming on westward as
though there was no end to them; which put old
Sylvester upon recalling the cheerful sports of his
younger days.
I have taken a couple of hundred in a net on the
Hill before breakfast, many a time, he said. You
used to help me, William.
Yes, I and old Ethan Barbary, said the
merchant
,
used to spring the net; you gave the word.
Old Ethan has been dead many a day. Ethan,
continued old Sylvester, in explanation, was the
father of our Mr. Barbary. He was a preacher too,
and carried a gun in the revolution. I remember he
was accounted a peculiar man. I never knew why.
To be sure he used to spend the time he did not
employ
in prayers, preaching and tending the sick, in
working on the farms about, for he had no wages for
preaching. When there was none of that to be had,
he took his basket, and sallying through the fields,
gathered berries, which he bestowed on the needy
families of the neighborhood. In winter he collected
branches in the woods about, as fire-wood for the
poor.
That was a capital idea, said Oliver the
politician
.
It must have made him very popular.
Wasn't he always thought to be a little out of
his head? asked the merchant. He might have
sold the wood for a good price in the severe winters.
I remember as if it were yesterday, old
Sylvester
went on in his own way, not heeding in the
slightest
the suggestions of his sons, he and black
Burling
,
who is buried in the woods by the Great
Walnut
tree, near the pond, both fought in the American
ranks, and had but one gun between them, which
they used turn about.
You saw rough times in those days, grandfather,
said the Captain.
I did, Charley, old Sylvester answered, looking
kindly on the Captain, who had always been
something
of a favorite of his from the day he had married
into the family; and there are but few left to talk
with me of them now. I am one of the living
survivors
of an almost extinguished race. The grave
will soon be our only habitation. I am one of the
few stalks that still remain in the field where the
tempest
passed. I have fought against the foreign foe
for your sake; they have disappeared from the land,
and you are free; the strength of my arm delays,
and my feet fail me in the way; the hand which
fought for your liberties is now open to bless you.
In my youth I bled in battle that you might be
independent
let
not my heart, in my old age, bleed
because
you abandon the path I would have you
follow
.
The old patriarch leaned his head upon his hand,
and the company was silent as though they had
listened to a voice from the grave. He presently
looked up and smiledOld Ethan, I call to mind
now, he renewed, had a quality which our poor
Barbary inherited, and for which, he added, looking
toward his son William, and for which I greatly
honor his memory. He counted the money of this
world but as dross. From his manhood to the very
moment of his entering on the ministry, he never
would touch silver nor gold, partly, I think, because
it was the true Scripture course, and partly because a
dreadful murder had once happened in the Barbary
family, growing out of a quarrel for the possession of
a paltry sum of money.
The bread she was raising to her lips fell from the
widow's hand, for she could not help but think of the
history of her absent son; and the voice of Miriam,
who did not present herself at the table, was heard
from a distant chamber, not distinctly, but in that
tone of chanting lament which had become habitual
to her whether in house, garden, or field. It was an
inexpressibly mournful cadence, and for the time
stilled
all other sounds. They were only drawn away
from it by descrying Mopsey, the black servant, at a
turn of the road, hurrying with great animation
towards
the homestead, but with a singularity in her
progress which could not fail to be observed. She
rushed along at great speed, for several paces, and
suddenly came to a halt, during which her head
disappeared
,
and then renewed her pace, repeating the
peculiar manuvre once at least in every ten yards.
In a word, she was shuffling on in her loose shoes,
(which were on or off, one or the other of them every
other minute,) at as rapid a rate as that peculiar
species
of locomotion allowed. Bursting with impatience
and the importance of her communication, her cap
flaunting from her head, she stood in the doorway
and announced, We've beat Brundagewe've beat
Brundage!
What's this, Mopsey? old Sylvester inquired.
I've tried it and I've spanned it. I can't span
ours!
On further questioning it appeared that Mopsey
had been on a pilgrimage to the next neighbor's, the
Brundages, to inspect their thanksgiving pumpkin,
and institute a comparison with the Peabody growth
of that kind, with a highly satisfactory and
complacent
result as regarded the home production.
Nobody
was otherwise than pleased at Mopsey's
innocent
rejoicing, and when she had been duly
complimented
on her success, she went away with a broad
black guffaw to set a trap in the garden for the
brown mouse, the sole surviving enemy of the great
Peabody thanksgiving pumpkin which must be
plucked
next day for use.
With the dispatch of the evening meal, old
Sylvester
withdrew to the other room, with a little hand
lamp, to read a chapter by himself. The others
remaining seated about the apartment; the Captain
and Oliver presently fell into a violent discussion on
the true sources of national wealth, the Captain
giving
it as his opinion that it solely depended on having
a great number of ships at sea, as carriers between
different countries. Oliver was equally clear and
resolute that the real wealth of a nation lay in its
wheat crops. When wheat was at ten shillings the
bushel, all went well; let it fall a quarter, and you
had general bankruptey staring you in the face. Mr.
William Peabody was'nt at the pains to deliver his
3*
opinion, but he was satisfied, in his secret soul, that
it lay in the increase of new houses, or the proper
supply of calicoeshe had'nt made up his mind
which. Presently Oliver was troubled again in
reference
to the supply of gold in the worldwhether
there was enough to do business with; he also had
some things to say (which he had out of a great
speech in Congress) about bullion and rates of
exchange
,
but nobody understood him.
By the way, he added, Mrs. Carrack's son
Tiffany is gone to the Gold Region. From what he
writes to me I think he'll cut a very great figure in
that country.
An exceedingly fine, talented young man, said
the merchant, who had, then, sundry sums on loan
from his mother.
In any point of view, in which you regard it,
continued Oliver, the gold country is an important
acquisition.
You hav'nt the letter Tiffany wrote, with you?
interrupted the Captain.
I think I have, was the answer. I brought
it, supposing you might like to look at it. Shall I
read it?
There was no objectionthe letter was readin
which Mr. Tiffany Carrack professed his weariness of
civilized lifespoke keenly of misspent hoursa
determination to rally and do something important,
intimating that that was a great country for
enterprising
young men, and, in a familiar phrase, closed
with a settled resolution to do or die.
I have a letter to the same effect, said the
Captain
.
And so have I, said William Peabody, word
for word.
He means to do something very grand, said the
Captain. Something very grand  the women all
agreedfor Mr. Tiffany Carrack was a nice young
man, and had a prospect of inheriting a hundred
thousand dollars, to say nothing of the large sums he
was to bring from the Gold Regions. It was evident
to all that he was going into the business with a
rush. They, of course, would'nt see Mr. Tiffany
Carrack at this Thanksgiving gatheringhe had
better
business on handMr. Tiffany Carrack was clearly
the promising young man of the family, and was
carrying the fortunes of the Peabodys into the
remotest
quarters of the land.
In a word, said Mr. Oliver Peabody, developing
the Declaration of Independence on his
pocket-handkerchief
.
He is going to do wonders in every point
of view. He'll carry the principles of Free
Government
everywhere!
The consideration of the extraordinary talents and
enterprise of the son imparted a new interest to the
question of the coming of Mrs. Carrack; which was
rediscussed
in all its bearings; and it was almost
unanimously
concludedthat, one day now only intervening
to Thanksgivingit was too late to look for her.
There had been a general disposition, secretly opposed
only by Mrs. Jane Peabody, to yield to that fashionable
person the best bed-chamber, which was always
accounted
a great prize and distinguished honor among
the family. But now there was scarcely any need of
reserving it longerand who was to have it? Alas!
that is a question often raised in rural households,
often shakes them to the very base, and spreads
through whole families a bitterness and strength and
length of strife, which frequently ends only with
life itself.
To bring the matter to an issue, various whispered
conversations were held in the small room, lying next
to the sitting-room, at first between Mrs. Margaret
Peabody and Mopsey, to which one by one were
summoned
,
Mrs. Jane Peabody, the Captain's wife, and
Mrs. Hannah Peabody. The more it was discussed
the farther off seemed any reasonable conclusion.
When one arrangement was proposed, various faces
of the group grew dark and sour; when another,
other faces blackened and elongated; tongues, too,
wagged faster every minute, and at length grew to
such a hubbub as to call old Sylvester away from his
Bible and bring him to the door to learn what
turmoil
it was that at this quiet hour disturbed the peace
of the Peabodys. He was not long in discovering
the ground of battle, and even as in old pictures
Adam is shown walking calmly in Eden among the
raging beasts of all degrees and kinds, the old
patriarch
came forward among the women of the Peabody
familyMy children, he said, should dwell in
peace for the short stay allotted them on earth. Why
make a difference about so small a matter as a
lodging-place
they
are all good and healthful rooms. I
have seen the day when camping on the wet grounds
and morasses I would have held any one of them to
be a palace-chamber. The back chamber, my child,
he continued, addressing the Captain's wife, looks
out on the orchard, where you always love to walk;
the white room, Hannah, towards your father's
house; and Jane, you cannot object to the front
chamber
which is large, well-furnished, and has the best
of the sunrise. The Son of Man, my children, had
not where to lay his head, and shall we who are but
snails and worms, compared with his glory and
goodness
,
presume to exalt ourselves, where he was
abased.
The old patriarch wished them a good night,
and with the departure of his white locks
gleaming
as he walked away, as though it had been the
gentle radiance of the moon stilling the tumult of
the waters, they each quietly retired, and without a
further murmur, to the chambers assigned them.
CHAPTER FIFTH.
THE CHILDREN.
There
was no question where the children were to
lodge, for there had been allotted to them from time
immemorial, ever since children were known in the
Peabody family, a great rambling upper chamber,
with beds in the corners, where they were always
bestowed
as soon after dark as they could be convoyed
thither under direction of Mopsey and the mistress
of the household. This was not alwaysin truth it
was rarelyeasy of achievement, and cost the shuffling
black servant at least half an hour of diligent search
and struggling persuasion to bring them in from the
various strayings, escapes, and lurking-places, where
they shirked to gain an extra half-hour of freedom.
To the children, however darker humors might
work and sadden among the grown people, (for
whatever
hue rose-favored writers may choose to throw
over scenes and times of festivity, the passions of
character
are always busy, in holiday and hall, as well as
in the strifes of the world,) to the Peabody children
this was thanksgiving time indeedit was
thanksgiving
in the house, it was thanksgiving in the
orchard
,
climbing trees; it was thanksgiving in the barn,
tumbling in the hay, in the lane. It was
thanksgiving
,
too, with the jovial Captain, a grown-up boy,
heading their sports and allowing the country as he
did, little rest or peace of mind wherever he lead the
revel; it was not four-and-twenty hours that he had
been at the quiet homestead before the mill was set
a-running, the chestnut-trees shaken, the pigeons
fired into, a new bell of greater compass put upon the
brindle cow, the blacksmith's anvil at the corner of
the road set a-dinging, fresh weather-cocks clapped
upon the barn, corn-crib, stable, and out-house, the
sheep let out of the little barn, all the boats of the
neighborhood launched upon the pond. With night,
darkness closed upon wild frolic; bed-time came, and
thanksgiving had a pause; a pause only, for Mopsey's
dark head, with its broad-bordered white cap, was no
sooner withdrawn and the door firmly shut, than
thanksgiving began afresh, as though there had been
no such thing all day long, and they were now just
setting out. For half a minute after Mopsey's
disappearance
they were all nicely tucked in as she had left
themstraight outwith their heads each square on
its pillow; then, as if by a silent understanding, all
heads popped up like so many frisking fish. They
darted from bed and commenced in the middle of the
chamber, a great pillow-fight amicable and hurtless,
but furiously waged, till the approach of a broad
foot-step
sent them scampering back to their couches,
mum as mice. Mopsey, well aware of these frisks,
tarried till they were blown over, in her own
chamber
hard by, a dark room, mysterious to the fancy of
the children, with spinning wheels, dried gourd-shells
hung against the wall, a lady's riding-saddle, now out
of use this many a day, and all the odds and ends of an
ancient farm-house stored in heaps and strings about.
It was only at last by going aloft and moving a
trap in the ceiling, which was connected in tradition
with the appearance of a ghost, that they were at
length fairly sobered down and kept in bed, when
Mopsey, looking in for the last time, knew that it
was safe to go below. They had something left even
then, and kept up a talk from bed to bed, for a good
long hour more, at least.
What do you think of the turkey, Bill? began
Master Robert Peabody, the flat-featured, rising from
his pillow like a homely porpoise.
I don't know, Peabody Junior answered, I
don't care for turkeys.
Little Sam Peabody, the master of the turkey,
took this very much to heart.
I think he's a very fine one, continued Master
Robert, twice as big as last year's.
I'm very glad to hear you say that, Cousin
Robert
,
said little Sam Peabody, turning over toward
the quarter whence the voice of encouragement
came.
As fine a turkey as I've ever seen, Robert went on.
When do they kill him?
Little Sam struggled a little with himself, and
answered feebly, To-morrow.
There was silence for several minutes, broken
presently
by Peabody Junior, fixing his pillow, and
saying
Boys, I'm going to sleep.
Allowing some few minutes for this to take effect,
Master Robert called across the chamber to little Sam,
I wonder why Aunt Hannah wears that old green
shade on her face?
Pray don't say anything about that, little Sam
answered, Cousin don't like to hear about that!
Master Robertrather a blunt young gentleman
is not to be baffled so easily.
I say, Bill, why does your mother wear that
green patch over her eye? he called out.
There was no answer; he called again in a louder
key.
Hush! whispered Peabody Junior, who was
not asleep, but only thinking of it, in a tone of fear,
I don't know.
Is the eye gone? Robert asked again, bent on
satisfaction of some kind.
I don't know, was the whispered answer again.
Don't ask me anything about it.
I'm afraid Aunt Hannah's not happy, suggested
little Sam, timidly.
Pr'aps she is'nt, Sam, Peabody Junior answered.
What is the reason, continued little Sam, I
always liked her.
Don't know, was all Peabody Junior had to
reply.
Did you ever see that other eye? Bill, asked the
blunt young gentleman, whose head was still running
on the green shade.
Oh, go to sleep, will you, Nosey, cried Peabody
Junior. If you don't leave me alone I'll get up
and wollop you.
The flat-featured disappeared with his porpoise
face under the bed-clothes and breathed hard, but
kept close; and when he fell asleep he dreamed of
dragons and green umbrellas all night, at a fearful
rate.
I would'nt be angry, Cousin, said little Sam,
when the porpoise gave token that he was
hard-bound
in slumber. He don't mean to hurt your
feelings, I don't believe.
Pr'aps he don't, Peabody Junior rejoined.
What could I tell him, if I wanted to; all I know
is, mother has worn the shade ever since I can
recollect
anything. I think sometimes I can remember
she used to have it on as far back as when I was at
the breast, a very little child, and that I used to try
and snatch it awaywhich always made her very
sad.
Don't she ever take it away? asked little Sam.
I never saw it off in all my life; nor can I tell
you whether my dear mother has one eye or two. I
know she never likes to have any one look at it. It
makes her melancholy at once; nurse used to tell me
there was a mystery about itbut she would never
tell me any more. It always scares father when she
turns that side of her face on him, that I've noticed;
and he always at home sits on the other side of the
table from it.
I would'nt think any more about it to-night,
Cousin, said little Sam. I know it makes you
unhappy from your voice. Don't you miss some one
to-night that used to keep us awake with telling
pleasant stories?
I do, answered Peabody Junior. I'm thinking
of him now. I wish Cousin Elbridge was back again.
You know why he is'nt?
Father says it's because he's a bad young man.
And do you believe it, William?
I'm afraid he isfor father always says so.
A gentle figure had quietly opened the
chamber-door
,
and stood listening with breathless attention to
the discourse of the two children.
You wait and see, continued little Sam firmly,
I'm sure he'll come backand before long.
What makes you think so? William asked.
I'm sure I hope he will.
Because the red rooster, answered little Sam,
crowed yesterday morning for the first time since
he went away, and the red rooster knows more than
anybody about this farm except old grandfather.
Thinking how that could be, Peabody Junior fell
asleep; and little Sam, sure to dream of his absent
brother, shortly followed after. The gentle figure of
Miriam Haven glided into the chamber, to the bed-side
of little Sam, and watching his calm, innocent
features
which
were held to greatly resemble those of
the absent Elbridgewith tears in her eyes, she
breathed a blessing from her very heart on the dear
child who had faith in the absent one. A blessing!
such was her humble wish as she returned to her
chamber and laid her fair head on the pillow, a
blessing on such as believe in us when we are in
trouble and poverty, out of favor with the world,
when our good name is doubted, and when the
current
running sharply against, might overwhelm us,
were not one or two kind hands put forth to save
us from utter ruin and abandonment!
CHAPTER SIXTH.
THE FASHIONABLE LADY AND HER SON.
All
the next day, being the Wednesday before
thanksgiving, was alive and busy with the various
preparations for the great festival, now held to be a
sacred holiday throughout this wide-spread union.
The lark had no sooner called morning in the
meadow
than Mopsey, who seemed to regard herself as
having the entire weight of the occasion on her single
shoulders, slipped from bed, hurried to the garden,
and taking a last look at the great pumpkin as it lay
in all its golden glory, severed the vine at a stroke
and trundled it with her own arms, (she saw with a
smile of pity the poor brown mouse skulking off, like
a little pirate as he was, disappointed of his prize,) in
at the back-door. The Peabodys were gathering for
breakfast, and coming forward, stood at either side of
the entrance regarding the pumpkin with profound
interest. It fairly shook the house as it rolled in upon
the kitchen floor.
When little Sam, who had lingered in bed beyond
the others, with pleasant dreams, came down stairs,
he was met by young William Peabody.
What do you think, Sam? said Peabody Junior,
smiling.
I suppose Aunt Carrack has come, Sam
answered
.
It's nothing to me if she has.
No, that isn't it.Turkey's dead!
Little Sam dropped a tear, and went away by
himself
to walk in the garden. Little Sam took no
breakfast that morning.
Every window in the house was thrown wide open
to begin with; every chair walked out of its place;
the new broom which Miriam had gathered with a
song, was used for the first time freely on every floor,
in every nook and corner; then the new broom was
carried away, and locked in a closet like a conjuror
who had wrought his spell and need not appear again
till some other magic was to be performed. All the
chairs were set soberly and steadily against the wall,
the windows were closed, and a sacred shade thrown
over the house against the approaching festival. The
key was turned in the lock of the old parlor, which
was to have no company (save the tall old clock
talking
all alone in the corner to himself) till
to-morrow
.
And so the day sailed on, like a dainty boat with
silent oar on a calm-flowing stream, to evening, when,
as though it had been a new-born meteor or great
will-o'-the-wisp, there appeared on the edge of the
twilight, along the distant horizon, a silvery glitter,
which, drawing nearer and nearer, presently disclosed
a servant in a shining band mounted on a great
coach, with horses in burnished harness; with
champing
speed, which it seemed must have borne it far
beyond, it came to in a moment at the very gate of
the homestead, as at the striking of a clock. A
gentleman
in bearded lip, in high polish of hat, chains
and boots, emerged, (the door being opened by a
stripling also in a banded hat, who leaped from
behind
,)
followed by a lady in a gown of glossy silk and
a yellow feather, waving in the partial darkness from
her hat. Such wonder and astonishment as seized on
the Peabodys, who looked on it from the balcony, no
man can describe.
Angles have descended before now and walked
upon the earthgiants have been at some time or
other seen strutting aboutghosts appear
occasionally
4
in the neighborhood of old farm-houses, but neither
ghost, giant, nor angel had such a welcome of
uplifted
hands and staring eyes as encountered Mrs.
Carrack and her son Tiffany, when they, in the body
entered in at the gate of the old Peabody mansion at
that time. There was but one person in the
company
,
old Sylvester perhaps excepted, who seemed to
have his wits about him, and that was the red rooster
who, sitting on the wall near the gate when Mr.
Tiffany Carrack pushed it open, cocked his eye
smartly
on him, and darted sharply at his white hand, with
its glittering jewel as he laid it on the gate.
Nancy, said old Sylvester, addressing her with
extended grasp, and a pleasant smile of welcome on
his brow, we had given up looking for you.
Was there ever such a rash old man! Nancy!
as though she had been a common person he was
speaking to.
Mrs. Carrack, who was a short woman, stiff and
stern, tossing her feather, gave the tips of her fingers
to the patriarch, and ordering in a huge leathern
trunk all over brass nails and capital C's, condescended
to enter into the house. In spite of all resolutions
and persuasions to the contrary the door of the best
parlor unlocked before her grandeur of demeanor, and
she took possession as though she had not the
slightest
connection with the other members of the
Peabody
family, nor the remotest interest in the
common
sitting-room without. Mr. Tiffany Carrack, with
patent shanks to his boots which sprang him into the
air as he walked, corsets to brace his body in,
new-fangled
straps to keep him down, a patent collar of a
peculiar invention, to hold his head aloft, moving as
it were under the convoy of a company of invisible
influences, deriving all his motions from the
shoe-maker
,
stay-maker, tailor and linen-draper, who
originally
wound him up and set him a-going, for whose
sole convenience he lives, having withal, by way of
paint to his ashy countenance, a couple of little
conch-shell
tufts, tawny-yellow, (that being the latest to be
had at the perfumer's,) on his upper lip; the
representative
and embodiment of all the latest new
improvements
,
patents, and contrivances in apparel, Mr.
Tiffany
Carrack followed his excellent mother.
Why, Tiffany, said old Sylvester, who
notwithstanding
the immensity of these people, calmly
pursued
his old course, we all thought you were in
California.
The family were gathered around and awaited Mr.
Tiffany Carrack's answer with a good deal of curiosity.
That was all a delusion, sir, he replied, plucking
at his little crop of yellow tufts,a horrible
delusion
.
I had some thought of that kind in my mind,
in fact I had got as far south as New Orleans, when
I met a seedy fellow who told me that the natives
had rebelled and wouldn't work any more; so I
found if I would get any of the precious, I must dig
with a shovel with my own dear digits; of course I
turned back in disgust, and here I am as good as
newJehoshaphat!
It was well that Mr. Tiffany had a fashion of
emphasizing
his discourse with a reference to this
ancient
person, whom he supposed to have been an
excuisite
of the first water, which happily furnished a
cover under which the entire Peabody family
exploded
with laughter at Mr. Carrack's announcement of
the sudden termination of his grand expedition to the
Gold Region. Without an exception they all went
off in an enormous burst, the Captain, little Sam, and
Mopsey leading.
Every word true, 'pon my honor, repeated Mr.
Carrack.
The great burst was renewed.
It was a capital idea, wasn't it? he said again,
supposing he had made a great hit.
The explosion for the third time, but softened a
little by pity in the female section of the chorus.
Mrs. Carrack had sat stately and aloof, with an
inkling in her brain that all this mirthful tumult was
not entirely in the nature of a complimentary tribute
to her son.
I think, she said, with haughty severity of
aspect
,
my son was perfectly right. It was a sinful
and a wicked adventure at the best, as the Reverend
Strawbery Hyson clearly showed from the fourth
Revelations
,
in his last annual discourse to the young
ladies of the church.
He did, so he did, said Mr. Tiffany, stroking
his chin, I remember perfectly: it was very
prettily
stated by Hyson.
The Reverend Strawbery Hyson, said Mrs.
Carrack
.
Always give that excellent man his full title.
What would you say, my son, if he should appear in
the streets without his black coat and white cravat?
Would you have any confidence in his preaching
after that?
Next to myself, answered Mr. Tiffany, I think
our parson's the best-dressed man in Boston.
He should be, as an example, said Mrs.
Carrack
.
He has a very genteel congregation.
Old Sylvester, who had on at that moment an old
brown coat and a frayed black ribbon for a neck-cloth,
ordered Mopsey to send the two best pies in the
house immediately to the negroes in the Hills. Mrs.
Carrack smiled loftily, and drew from her pocket an
elegant small silver vial of the pure otto of rose, and
applied it to her nostrils as though something
disagreeable
had just struck upon the air and tainted it.
By the way, said Mr. Tiffany Carrack, adjusting
his shirt collar, how is my little friend Miriam?
Melancholy! was the only answer any one had
to make.
So I thought, pursued Mr. Carrack, rolling his
eyes and heaving an infant sigh from his bosom.
Poor thing, no wonder, if she thought I was gone
away so far. She shall be comforted.
Mopsey looking in at this moment, gave the
summons
to tea, which was answered by Mr. Tiffany
Carrack's
offering his arm, impressively, to his excellent
mother, and leading the way to the table.
It was observed, that in his progress to the tea-table,
Mr. Tiffany adopted a tottering and uncertain step,
indicating a dilapidated old age, only kept together
by the clothes he wore, which was altogether
unintelligible
to the Peabody family, seeing that Mr.
Carrack was in the very prime of youth, till Mrs.
Carrack
remarked, with an affectionate smile of motherly
pride:
You remind me more and more every day, Tiff,
of that dear delightful old Baden-Baden.
I wish the glorious old fellow would come over to
me for a short lark, rejoined Mr. Tiffany. But he
couldn't live here long; there's nothing old here.
Who's Baden Baden? asked Sylvester.
Only a prince of my acquaintance on the other
side of the water, and a devilish clever fellow. But
he could'nt stand it hereI'm afraideverything's
so new.
I'm rather old, suggested Sylvester, smiling on
the young man.
So you are, by JoveBut that aint the thing I
want exactly; I want an old castle or two, and a
donjon-keep
,
and that sort of thing.You understand.
Something, suggested the grandfather, in the
style of the old revolutionary fort on Fort Hill?
Nonoyou don't take exactly. I mean
something
more in the antiquesomething or other, you
seehere he began twirling his forefinger in the
air and sketching an amorphous phantom of some
sort, of an altogether unattainable character, in a
wordJehoshaphat!
The moment the eye of Mrs. Carrack fell upon the
blue and white crockery, the pewter plates which had
been in use time out of mind in the family, and the
plain knives and forks of steel, she cast on her son a
significant glance of mingled surprise and contempt.
Thomas, she said, standing before the place
assigned
to her, her son doing the same, the napkins!
The napkins were brought from a great basket
which had accompanied the leathern trunk.
The other things!
The other things, consisting of china plates, cups
and saucers, and knives and forks of silver for two,
were duly laidMrs. Carrack and her son having
kept the rest of the family waiting the saying of
grace by old Sylvester, were good enough to be
seated
at the old farmer's (Mrs. Carrack's father's) board.
When old Sylvester unclosed his eyes from the
delivery of thanks, he discovered at the back of Mrs.
Carrack and her son's chairs, the two city servants in
livery, with their short cut hair and embroidered coats
of the fashion of those worn in English farces on the
stage, standing erect and without the motion of a
muscle. There is not a doubt but that old Sylvester
Peabody was a good deal astonished, although he
gave no utterance to his feelings. But when the two
young men in livery began to dive in here and there
about the table, snapping up the dishes in exclusive
service on Mrs. Carrack and Mr. Tiffany Carrack, he
could remain silent no longer.
Boys, he said, addressing himself to the two fine
personages in question, you will oblige me by going
into the yard and chopping wood till we are done
supper. We shall need all you can split in an hour
to bake the pies with.
Thunder struck, as though a bolt had smitten them
individually in the head, this direction, delivered in a
quiet voice of command not to be resisted, sent the
two servants forth at the back-door. They were
no sooner out of view than they addressed each other
4*
almost at the same moment, My eyes! did you ever
see such a queer old fellow as that!
When Mrs. Carrack and her son turned, and
found that the two young gentlemen in livery had
actually vanished, the lady smiled a delicate smile of
gentle scorn, and Mr. Tiffany, regarding his aged
grandfather steadily, merely remarked, in a tone of
most friendly and familiar condescension, Baden-Baden wouldn't have done such a thing!
The overpowering grandeur of the fashionable lady
chilled the household, and there was little
conversation
till she addressed the widow Margaret.
Hadn't you a grown up son, Mrs. Peabody?
The widow was silent. Presently Mr. Carrack
renewed
the discourse.
By the by, he said, I thought I saw that son
of yourswasn't his name Elbridge, or something of
that sort?in New Orleans.
Did you speak to him? asked the Captain,
flushing
a little in the face.
I observed he was a good deal out at elbows,
Mr. Carrack answered, and it was broad day-light,
in one of the fashionable streets.
Is that all you have to tell us of your cousin?
old Sylvester inquired.
He is my cousinmuch obliged for the
information
.
I had almost forgotten that! Why ye-esI
couldn't help seeing that he went into a miserable
broken-down house in a by-streetbut had to get
my moustache oiled for a Creole ball that evening,
and couldn't be reasonably expected to follow him,
could I?Jehoshaphat!
If the human countenance, by reason of its
clouding
up in gusts of pitchy blackness acquired the
power, like darkening skies, of discharging
thunder-bolts
,
it would have been, I am sure, a hot and heavy
one which Mopsey, blackening and blazing, had
delivered
,
as she departed to the kitchen, lowering upon
Mr. Tiffany Carrack,`
He thought he saw her son
Elbridge!
' The vagabone has no more feeling nor
de bottom of a stone jug.
The meal over, the evening wore on in friendly
chat of old Thanksgiving timesof neighbors and
early family histories; each one in turn launching,
so to speak, a little boat upon the current, freighted
deep with many precious stores of old-time
remembrance
;
Mrs. Carrack sitting alone as an iceberg in the
very midst of the waters, melting not once, nor
contributing
a drop or trickle to the friendly flow. And
when bed-time came again, how clearly was it shown,
that there is nothing certain in this changeful world.
By some sudden and unforeseen interruption,
nations
lose power, communities are shattered,
households
well-constructed fall in pieces at a breath.
Her sudden appearance in their midst, compelled
another consultation to be taken as to the disposal
of the great Mrs. Carrack for the night. It would
never answer to put that grand person in any
secondary
lodging; so all the old arrangements were of
necessity broken up; the best bed-room allotted to
her; and that her gentle nerves might not be
afflicted
,
the old clock, which adjoined her
sleeping-chamber
,
and which had occupied his corner and told the
time for the Peabodys for better than a hundred
years from the same spot, was instantly silenced, as
impertinent. The Captain's high-actioned white horse,
which had enjoyed the privilege of roaming
unmolested
about the house, was led away like an
unhappy
convict, and stabled in the barn; and to complete
the arrangements, the two servants in livery were put
on guard near her window, to drive off the geese,
turkeys, and other talkative birds of the night, that
she might sleep without the slightest disturbance
from that noisy old creature, Nature.
Mr. Tiffany Carrack, while these delicate
preparations
were in progress, was evidently agitated with
some extraordinary design, in which Miriam Haven
was bearing a part; for, although he did not address
a word to that young maiden, he was as busy as his
imitation of the antiquity of Baden-Baden would
allow
him, ogling, grimacing, and plucking his tawny
beard at her every minute in the most astonishing
manner, closely watched by Mopsey, the Captain,
and old Sylvester, who strongly suspected the young
man of being affected in his wits.
It was very clear that it was this same Mr. Tiffany
Carrack who had entered in at the door of the sleeping
chamber assigned to that gentleman, but who would
have ventured to assert that the figure, which,
somewhere
about the middle of the night, emerged from
the window of the chamber in question, in yellow
slippers
,
red silk cloak trimmed with gold, fez cap, and
white muslin turban, and, with folded arms, began
pacing up and down under the casement of Miriam
Haven, after the manner of singers at the opera,
preparatory
to beginning, was the same Tiffany? And
yet, when he returned again, and holding his face up
to the moon, which was shining at a convenient angle
over the edge of the house, the tawny tuft clearly
identified it as Tiffany and no one else. And yet, as if
to further confuse all recognition, what sound is
that which breaks from his throat, articulating:
Dearest, awakeyou need not fear;
For hefor heyour Troubadour is here!
The summons passed for some time unanswered,
till Mopsey, from the little end-window of her
lodgement
,
presented her head in a flaming red and yellow
handkerchief, and rolled her eyes about to discover
the source of the tumult; scowling in the belief that
it must be no other than one of dem Brundages come
to carry off in de dead of night de Peabody
punkin
.
A gentle conviction was dawning in the brain of Mr.
Carrack that this was the fair Miriam happily
responding
to his challenge in the appropriate character
and costume of a Moorish Princess; when, as he
began to roar again, still more violent and furious
in his chanting, the black head opened and
demanded
,
what you want dere? followed by an
extraordinary
shower of gourd-shells, which, crashing
upon his sconce, with a distinct shatter for each shell,
could not, for a moment, be mistaken for flowers,
signet-rings, or any other ordinarily recognised
love-tokens
.
It immediately occurred to Mr. Carrack, with the
suddenness of inspiration, that he had better return
to his chamber and go to bed; a design which was
checked, as he proceeded in that direction, by the
alarming apparition of a great body with a fire-lock
thrust out of the window of the apartment, next to his
own, occupied by the Captain, presented directly at
his head, with a cry Avast, there! and a
movement
on the part of the body, to follow the gun out
at the window. Fearfully harassed in that quarter,
Mr. Carrack wheeled rapidly about, encountering as
he turned, the two servants in livery, still making the
circuit of the homesteadwho in alarm of their
lives from this singular figure in the red cloak, fled into
the fields and lurked in an old out-house till daylight.
As these scampered away before him, Mr. Tiffany, to
relieve himself of the apparition of the gun, would
have turned the corner of the house; when Mopsey
appeared, wildly gesticulating, with a great
brush-broom
reared aloft, and threatening instant ruin to
his person.
From this double peril, what but the happiest
genius
could have suggested to Mr. Tiffany, an instant
and straightforward flight from the house; in which
he immediately engaged, making up the roadthe
Captain with his musket, and Mopsey with her
hearth-broom
,
close at his heels. If Mr. Tiffany Carrack
had promptly employed his undoubted resources of
youth and activity, his escape from the necessity of
disclosure or surrender had been perhaps easy; but
it so happened that his progress was a good deal
baffled by the conflict constantly kept up in his brain,
between the desire to use his legs in the natural
manner, and to preserve that antique pace of tottering
gentility which he had acquired from that devilish
fine old fellow, the Prince of Baden-Baden, so that
at one moment he was in the very hands of the
enemy, and at the next, flying like an antelope in the
distance. The gun, constantly following him with a
loud threat, from the Captain, seemed, in the
moon-light
,
like a great finger perpetually pointing at his
head; till at last it became altogether too dreadful
to bear, and making up the road toward Brundage's,
which still further inflamed the pursuit, in sheer
exhaustion
he rushed through an open gate into a
neighboring tan-yard, and took refuge in the old
bark-mill. There was but a moment's rest allowed
him even here, for Mopsey and the Captain, furiously
threatening all sorts of death and destruction,
presently
rushed in at the door, and sent him scampering
about the ring like a distracted colt, in his first
day's service; a game of short duration, for the
Captain
and Mopsey, closing in upon him from opposite
directions
compelled him to retreat again into the open
air. How much longer the chase might have
continued
,
it were hard to tell, for as his pursuers made
after him, Mr. Tiffany Carrack suddenly disappeared,
like a melted snow-flake, from the surface of the
earth. In his confused state he had tumbled into a
vat, fortunately without the observation of the
inexorable
enemy, although as he clung to the side the
Captain discharged his musket directly over his head.
I guess that's done his business, said the
Captain
.
We'll come and look for the body in the
morning.
Now it is strongly suspected that both Mopsey
and the Captain knew well enough all along that
this was Mr. Tiffany Carrack they had been
pursuing
,
and that as they watched him from the distance
emerge from the vat, return to the homestead, and
skulk, dripping in, like a rat of outlandish breed,
at his chamber-window, they were amply avenged:
the Captain, for the freedom with which the
city-exquisite
had treated the Peabody family,
especially
the good old grandfather, and Mopsey, for the
slighting manner in which he had referred to absent
young Mas'r Elbridge.
When all was peace again within the homestead,
there was one who still watched the night, and
ignorant
of the nature of this strange tumult, trembled as at
the approach of a long-wished for happiness. It was
Miriam, the orphan dependent, who now sat by the
midnight casement. Oh, who of living men can tell
how that young heart yearned at the thoughtthe
hopethe thrilling momentary beliefthat this was
her absent lover happily returning?
In the wide darkness of the lonesome night, which
was it shone brightest and with purest lustre, in view
of the all-seeing Mover of the Heavensthe stars
glittering far away in space, in all their lofty glory,
or the timid eyes of that simple maiden, wet with the
dew of youth, and bright with the pure hope of
honest
love! When all was still again, and no Elbridge's
voice was heard, no form of absent Elbridge there to
cheer her, oh, who can tell how near to breaking, in its
silent agony, was that young heart, and with what
tremblings of solicitude and fear, the patient Miriam
waited for the friendly light to open the golden-gate
of dawn upon another morrow!
CHAPTER SEVENTH.
THE THANKSGIVING SERMON.
The
morning of the day of Thanksgiving came
calm, clear and beautiful. A stillness, as of heaven
and not of earth, ruled the wide landscape. The
Indian
summer, which had been as a gentle mist or
veil upon the beauty of the time, had gone away a
littleretired, as it were, into the hills and back
country, to allow the undimmed heaven to shine
down upon the happy festival of families and nations.
The cattle stood still in the fields without a low;
the trees were quiet as in friendly recognition of the
spirit of the hour; no reaper's hook or mower's
scythe glanced in the meadow, no rumbling wain was
on the road. The birds alone, as being more nearly
akin to the feeling of the scene, warbled in the
boughs.
But out of the silent gloom of the mist there
sprang as by magic, a lovely illumination which lit
the country far and wide, as with a thousand
varicolored
lamps. As a maiden who has tarried in her
chamber, some hour the least expected appears before
us, apparelled in all the pomp and hue of brilliant
beauty, the fair country, flushed with innumerable
tints of the changed autumn-trees, glided forth upon
the Indian summer scene, and taught that when
kindly nature seems all foregone and spent, she can
rise from her couch fresher and more radiant than in
her very prime.
What wonder if with the peep of dawn the
children
leaped from bed, eager to have on their new
clothes reserved for the day, and by times appeared
before old Sylvester in proud array of little hats,
new-brightened shoes and shining locks, span new
as though they had just come from the mint;
anxious
to have his grandfatherly approval of their
comeliness
?
Shortly after, the horses caught in the
distant
pastures, the Captain and Farmer Oliver having
charge of them, were brought in and tied under the
trees in the door-yard.
Then, breakfast being early dispatched, there was
a mighty running to and fro of the grown people
through the house, dresses hurried from old
clothes-presses
and closets, a loud demand on every hand for
pins, of which there seemed to be (as there always is
on such occasions) a great lack. The horses were put
to Mrs. Carrack's coach, the Captain's gig, the old
house-wagon, with breathless expectation on the part
of the children; and in brief, after bustling
preparation
and incessant summoning of one member of the
family and another from the different parts of the
house, all being at last ready and in their seats, the
Peabodys set forth for the Thanksgiving Sermon at
the country Meeting-house, a couple of miles away.
The Captain took the lead with his wife and
Peabody
Junior somewhere and somehow between
them, followed by the wagon with old Sylvester, still
proud of his dexterity as a driver, Oliver, much
pleased with the popular character of the conveyance
and wife, with young Robert; William Peabody and
wife; little Sam riding between his grandfather's legs
in front, and allowed to hold the end of the reins.
Slowly and in great state, after all rolled Mrs.
Carrack's
coach with herself and son within, and footman
and coachman without.
Chanticleer, too, clear of eye and bright of wing,
walked the garden wall, carried his head up, and
acted
as if he had also put on his thanksgiving suit and
expected to take the road presently, accompany the
family, and join his voice with theirs at the little
meeting-house.
Although the Captain, with his high-actioned
white horse kept out of eye-shot ahead, it was Mrs.
Carrack's fine carriage that had the triumph of the
road to itself, for as it rolled glittering on, the simple
country people, belated in their own preparations, or
tarrying at home to provide the dinner, ran to the
windows in wonder and admiration. The plain
wagons
,
bent in the same direction, turned out of the path
and gave the great coach the better half of the way,
staring a broadside as it passed.
And when the party reached the little
meeting-house
,
what a peace hung about it! The air seemed
softer, the sunshine brighter, there, as it stood in
humble silence among the tall trees which waved
with a gentle murmur before its windows. The
people
,
as they arrived, glided noiselessly in, in their
neat dresses and looks of decent devotion; others
as they came made fast their horses under the sheds
and trees aboutmost of them in wagons and plain
chaises, brightened into all of beauty they were
capable
of, by a severe attention to the harness and
mountings; othersthese were a few bachelors and
striplingstrotted in quietly on horseback. Before
service a few of the old farmers lingered outside
discussing
the late crops or inquiring after each other's
families, who presently went within, summoning from
the grassy churchyardwhich lay next to the
meeting
housethe children who were loitering there
reading the grave-stones.
When the Captain arrived with his gig, under
such extraordinary headway that he was near driving
across the grave-yard into the next countythe
country people scampered aside, like scared fowl;
Mrs. Carrack's great coach, with its liveried outriders,
set them staring as if they did not or could not
believe
their own eyes. With the arrival of old
Sylvester
they re-gathered, and, almost in a body,
proffered
their aid to hold the horsesto help the old
Patriarch to the groundin a word, to show their
regard
and affection in every way in their power. He
tarried but a moment at the door, to speak a word
with one or two of the oldest of his neighbors, and
passed in, followed by all of his family save Mrs.
Carrack and her son, who under color of hunting up
the grave of some old relation, delay in order to
make their appearance in the meeting-house by
themselves, and independently of the Peabody
connection
.
Will you pardon me, reader, if I fail to tell you
whether this house of worship was of the Methodist,
Episcopal, or Baptist creed, whether it had a chancel
or altar, or painted windows? Whether the pews
had doors to them and were cushioned or not?
Whether the minister wore a gown and bands, or
plain suit of black, or was undistinguished in his
dress? Will it not suffice if I tell you, as the very
belief of my soul, that it was a christian house, that
there were seats for all, that things were well
intended
and decently ordered, and that with a hymn sung
with such purity of heart that its praises naturally
joined in with the chiming of the trees and the carols
of the birds without and floated on without a stop to
Heaven, when a meek man rose up:
Some two hundred years ago, our ancestors (he
said,) finding themselves more comfortable in the
wilderness of the new world, than they could have
reasonably looked for, set apart a day of
Thanksgiving
to Almighty God for his manifold mercies. That
5
day, God be praised, has been steadily observed
throughout this happy land, by cheerful gatherings
of families, and other festive and devotional
observances
,
down to the present time. Our fathers
covenanted
,
in the love of Christ, to cleave together, as
brethren, however hard the brunt of fortune might be.
That bond still continues. We may not live (he went
on, in the very spirit and letter of the first
Thanksgiving
discourse ever delivered amongst us,) as
retired
hermits, each in our cell apart, nor inquire, like
David, how liveth such a man? How is he clad?
How is he fed? He is my brother, we are in league
together, we must stand and fall by one another. Is
his labor harder than mine? Surely I will ease him.
Hath he no bed to lie on? I have twoI will lend
him one. Hath he no apparel? I have two suits
I will give him one of them. Eats he coarse food,
bread and water, and have I better? Surely we
will part stakes. He is as good a man as I, and we
are bound each to other; so that his wants must be
my wants; his sorrows, my sorrows; his sickness my
sickness; and his welfare my welfare; for I am as
he is; such a sweet sympathy were excellent,
comfortable
,
nay, heavenly, and is the only maker and
conserver
of churches and commonwealths.
To such as looked upon old Sylvester there seemed
a glow and halo about his aged brow and whitened
locks, for this was the very spirit of his life.
As though he knew the very secrets of their souls, and
touched their very heart-strings with a gentle hand,
the preacher glanced from one member of the
Peabody
household to another, as he proceeded,
something
in this manner. (For William Peabody:) do I
find on this holy day that I love God in all his
glorious
universe, more than the image even of Liberty,
which hath ensnared and enslaved the soul of many
a man on the coin of this world? (For buxom Mrs.
Jane, in her vandyke:) Do I stifle the vanity of good
looks and comfortable circumstances under a plain
garb? (For the jovial Captain:) Am I not over hasty
in pursuit of carnal enjoyment? (For Mr. Oliver:
who was wiping his brow with the Declaration of
Independence
,)
and eager over much for the good opinion
of men, when I should be quietly serving them without
report? (For Mrs. Carrack and her son:) And what
are pomp and fashion, but the painted signs of good
living where there is no life? These (he continued,)
are all outward, mere pretences to put off our duty,
and the care of our souls. Yea, we may have
churches, schools, hospitals aboundingbut these are
mere lath and mortar, if we have not also within
our own hearts, a church where the pure worship
ever goeth on, a school where the true knowledge is
taught, a hospital, the door whereof standeth
constantly
open, into which our fellow-creatures are
welcomed
and where their infirmities are first cared for
with all kindness and tenderness. If these be our
inclinings this day, let us be reasonably thankful on
this Thanksgiving morning. Let such as are in
health be thankful for their good case; and such as
are out of health be thankful that they are no worse.
Let such as are rich be thankful for their wealth, (if
it hath been honestly come by;) and let such as are
poor be thankful that they have no such charge upon
their souls. Let old folks be thankful for their
wisdom
in knowing that young folks are fools; and let
young ones be thankful that they may live to see the
time when they may use the same privilege. Let
lean folks be thankful for their spare ribs, which are
not a burthen in the harvest-field; fat folks may
laugh at lean ones, and grow fatter every day. Let
married folks be thankful for blessings both little and
great; let bachelors and old maids be thankful for
the privilege of kissing other folks' babies, and great
good may it do them.
With what a glow of mutual friendship the quaint
preacher was warming the plain old meeting-house on
that thanksgiving day!
Finally, and to conclude, (he went on in the
language
of a chronicle of the time:)Let no man
look upon a turkey to-day, and say, `This also
is vanity.' What is the life of man without
creature-comforts
,
and the stomach of the son of man
with no aid from the tin kitchen? Despise not the
day of small things, while there are pullets on the
spit, and let every fowl have fair play, between the
jaws of thy philosophy. Are not puddings made to
be sliced, and pie-crust to be broken? Go thy ways,
then, according to good sense, good cheer, good
appetite
,
the Governor's proclamation, and every other
good thing under the sun;render thanks for all the
good things of this life, and good cookery among the
rest; eat, drink, and be merry; make not a lean
laudation
of the bounties of Providence, but let a lively
gusto follow a long grace. Feast thankfully, and
feast hopingly; feast in good will to all mankind,
Grahamites included; feast in the full and joyous
persuasion, that while the earth remaineth, seed-time
and harvest, dinner-time, pudding-time, and
supper-time
,
are not likely to go out of fashion;feast with
exulting confidence in the continuance of cooks,
kitchens
,
and orthodox expounders of Scripture and the
constitution in our ancient, blessed, and fat-sided
commonwealthfeast, in short, like a good Christian,
proving all things, relishing all things, hoping all
things, expecting all things, and enjoying all things.
Let a good stomach for dinner go hand in hand with
a good mind for sound doctrine. Let us all be
thankful that a gracious Providence hath furnished
each and all with a wholesome and bountiful dinner
this day; and, if there be none so furnished, let him
now make it known, and we will instantly contribute
thereto of our separate abundance. There are none
who murmurwe all, therefore, have a thanksgiving
dinner waiting for us; let us hie home cheerily, and
in a becoming spirit of mirth and devotion partake
thereof.
The windows of the little meeting-house were up
to let in the pleasant sunshine; and the very horses
who were within hearing of his voice, seemed by the
pricking up of their brown ears to relish and approve
of his discourse. The Captain's city nag, as wide
awake as any, seemed to address himself to an
acquaintance
of a heavy bay plougher, who stood at
the same post, and laying their heads together for
the better part of the sermon, they appeared to
regard
it, as far as they caught its meaning, as sound
doctrine, particularly acknowledging that this was as
fine a thanksgiving morning as they (who had been
old friends and had spent their youth together, being
in some way related, in a farm-house in that
neighborhood
)
had ever known; and when they had said
as much as this, they laughed out in very merriness
of spirit, with a great winnow, as the happy audience
came streaming forth at the meeting-house door.
There were no cold, haughty, or distrustful faces
now, as when they had entered in an hour ago; the
genial air of the little meeting-house had melted
away all frosts of that kind; and as they mingled
under
the sober autumn-trees, loitering for conversation,
inquiring after neighbors, old folks whose infirmities
kept them at home, the young children; they
seemed
indeed, much more a company of brethren,
embarked
(as sailors say) on a common bottom for
happiness
and enjoyment. The children were the first
to set out for home through the fields on foot;
Peabody
the younger, little Sam and Robert being
attended
by the footman in livery, whom Mrs. Carrack
relieved from attendance at the rear of the coach.
If the quaint preacher had urged the rational
enjoyment
of the Thanksgiving cheer from the pulpit,
Mopsey labored with equal zeal at home to have it
worthy of enjoyment. At an early hour she had
cleared decks, and taken possession of the kitchen:
kindling, with dawn, a great fire in the oven for the
pies, and another on the hearth for the turkey. But
it was from the oven, heaping it to the top with fresh
relays of dry wood, that she expected the
Thanksgiving
angel to walk in all his beauty and majesty.
In performance of her duty, and from a sense only
that there could be no thanksgiving without a turkey,
she planted the tin oven on the hearth, spitted the
gobbler, and from time to time, merely as a matter
of absolute necessity, gave it a turn; but about the
mouth of the great oven she hovered constantly, like
a spirithad her head in and out at the opening
every other minute; and, when at last the pies were
slided in upon the warm bottom, she lingered there
regarding the change they were undergoing with the
fond admiration with which a connoisseur in sunsets
hangs upon the changing colors of the evening sky.
The leisure this double duty allowed her was
employed
by Mopsey in scaring away the poultry and idle
young chickens which rushed in at the back entrance
of the kitchen in swarms, and hopped with yellow
legs about the floor with the racket of constant falling
showers of corn. Upon the half door opening on the
front the red rooster had mounted, and with his head
on one side observed with a knowing eye all that
went forward; showing perhaps most interest in the
turning of the spit, the impalement of the turkey
thereon having been with him an object of special
consideration.
The highly colored picture of Warren at
Bunker-Hill
,
writhing in his death-agony on one wall of the
kitchen, and General Marion feasting from a potato,
in his tent, on the other, did not in the least attract
the attention of Mopsey. She saw nothing on the
whole horizon of the glowing apartment but the
pies and the turkey, and even for the moment
neglected
to puzzle herself, as she was accustomed to in
the pauses of her daily labors, with the wonders
and mysteries of an ancient dog-eared spelling-book
which lay upon the smoky mantel.
Meanwhile, in obedience to the spirit of the day,
the widow Margaret and Miriam, having each
diligently
disposed of their separate charge in the
preparations
,
making a church of the homestead,
conducted
a worship in their own simple way. Opposite
to each other in the little sitting-room, Miriam
opened
the old Family Bible, and at the widow Margaret's
request read from that chapter which gives the story
of the prodigal son. It was with a clear and pensive
voice that she read, but not without a struggle with
herself. Where the story told that the young man
had gone into a far country; that he had wasted his
substance in riotous living; that he was abased to the
feeding of swine; that he craved in his hunger the
very husks; that he lamented the plenty of his
father's housea cloud came upon her countenance,
and the simplest eye could have interpreted the
thoughts that troubled her. And how the fair young
face brightened, when she read that the young man
resolved to arise and return to the house of his
father; the dear encounter; the rejoicing over his
return, and the glad proclamation, This, my son, was
dead and is alive again; he was lost and is found.
If he would come back even so, said the widow
when the book was closed, in sorrow, in poverty, in
crime even, I would thank God and be grateful.
He is not guilty, mother, Miriam pleaded,
casting
her head upon the widow's bosom and clinging
close about her neck.
I will not think that he is, Margaret answered,
lifting up her head. Guilty or innocent, he is my
sonmy son. Clasping the young orphan's hand,
after a pause of tender silence, she gave utterance to
her feelings in a Thanksgiving hymn. These were
the words:
Father! protect the wanderer on his way;
Bright be for him thy stars and calm thy seas
Thanksgiving live upon his lips to-day,
And in his heart the good man's summer ease.
Almighty! Thou canst bring the pilgrim back,
With a clear brow to this his childish home;
Guide him, dear Father, o'er a blameless track,
No more to stray from us, no more to roam.
At this moment a tumult of children's voices was
heard in the door-yard, and as the widow turned,
young William Peabody was seen struggling with
Robert and little Sam, who were holding him back
with all their force. As he dragged them forward,
being their elder and superior in strength, Peabody
Junior stretched his throat and called towards the
houseI've seen himI've seen him!
Who have you seen? asked the widow, rising
and approaching the door.
Mr. Barbary. When Peabody Junior made
this answer the widow advanced with a gleam on her
countenance, and gently releasing him, said, Come,
William, and tell us all about it.
Aunt Margaret, said Robert, thrusting himself
between, don't listen to a word he has to say. I'll
tell you all about it. You see we were coming home
from meeting, and little Sam got tired, and William
and I made a cradle of our hands and were carrying
him along very nice.
Not so very nice, either, Peabody Junior
interrupted
,
for I was plaguy tired.
That's what I was going to tell you, Aunt
Margaret
.
Bill did get tired, and as we came through
the Locust Wood, he made believe to see something,
and run away to get clear of carrying little Sam any
further.
I did see him! said Peabody Junior, firmly.
Where was he? the widow asked.
Behind the hazel-bush, with his head just looking
out at the top, all turned white as dead folks do.
Mopsey was in immediately with her dark head,
crying out, Don't belief a word of it.
I guess you saw nothing but the hazel-bush,
William, said the widow.
That was it, Aunt; it was the hazel-bush with a
great mop of moss on it, Robert added.
Miriam sat looking on and listening, pale and
trembling.
If your cousin Elbridge and Mr. Barbary should
ever come back, said the widow, addressing
Peabody
Junior, you would be sorry for what you have
said, William.
So he would, Aunt, echoed Robert.
Mopsey was in again from the kitchen; this time
she advanced several steps from the door-sill into the
room, lifted up both her arms and addressed the
assembled company.
One ting I know, said Mopsey, dere's a big
pie baking in dat ere oven, and if Mas'r Elbridge
don't eat that pie it'll haf to sour, dat I know.
What is it, Mopsey, asked Margaret, that
gives you such a faith in my son?
I tell you what it is, Missus, Mopsey answered
promptly, dast tanksgivin when I tumbled down
on dis ere sef-same floor bringin' in de turkey, every
body laugh but Mas'r Elbridge, and he come from his
place and pick me up. He murder any body! I'll
eat de whole tanksgivin dinner myself if he touch
a hair of de old preacher's head to hurt it.
Suddenly
changing her tone, she added, Dey're comin'
from meetin', I hear de old wagon.
CHAPTER EIGHTH.
THE DINNER.
As the Peabodys approached the homestead, the
smoke of the kitchen chimney was visible, circling
upward and winding about in the sunshine as though
it had been a delicate corkscrew uncorking a great
bottle or square old flask of a delicious vintage. The
Captain averred a quarter of a mile away, the
moment
they had come upon the brow of the hill, that
he had a distinct savor of the fragrance of the turkey,
and that it was quite as refreshing as the first odor
of the land breeze coming in from sea, and he snuffed
it up with a zeal and relish which gave the gig an
eager appetite for dinner. The Captain's conjecture
was strongly confirmed in the appearance of Mopsey,
darting, with a dark face of dewy radiance at the
wood-pile and shuffling back with bustling speed to
the kitchen with a handful of delicate splinters.
She's giving him the last turn, said the Captain.
The shadow of the little meeting-house was still
over the Captain, even so far away, for he conducted
the procession homeward at a pace much less furious
than that with which he had advanced in the
morning
;
and Mrs. Carrack too, observed now, with a
strange pleasure, what she had given no heed to
before
when the fine coach was rolling in triumph along
the road,birds twittering in the sunny air by the
wayside, and cattle roving like figures in a beautiful
picture, upon the slopes of the distant hills. Oliver,
the politician, more than once had out the great
cotton
pocket-handkerchief, and holding it spread before
him contemplating the fatherly signers, was
evidently
acquiring some new lights on the subject of
independence
.
A change, in fine, of some sort or other, had
passed
over every member of the Peabody family save
old Sylvester, returning as going, calm, plain-spoken,
straightforward and patriarchal. When they
reached
the gate of the homestead, William Peabody gave
his hand to his wife and helped her, with some show
of attention, to alight; and then there could be no
doubt that it was in very truth Thanksgiving day, for
the glory of the door-yard itself had paled and
disappeared
in the gorgeous festal light. There was no
majestic gobbler in the door-yard now, with his great
outspread tail, which in the proud moments of his
life he would have expanded as if to shut the very
light of the sun from all meaner creatures of the
mansion.
Within doors there was that bustling preparation,
with brief lulls of ominous silence which precede and
usher a great event. The widow Margaret, with
noiseless step, glided to and fro, Miriam daintily
hovering
in the suburbs of the sitting-room, which is
evidently
the grand centre of interest, and Mopsey toils
like a swart goblin in her laboratory of the kitchen in
a high glow, scowling fearfully if addressed with a
word which calls her attention for a moment away
from her critical labors.
As the family entered the homestead on their
return
,
the combined forces were just at the point of
pitching their tent on the ground of the forthcoming
engagement, in the shape of the ancient four-legged
and wide-leaved table, with a cover of snowy
whiteness
,
ornamented as with shields and weapons of
quaint device, in the old plates of pewter and the
horn-handled knives and forks burnished to such a
polish as to make the little room fairly glitter.
Dishes streamed in one after the other in a long and
rapid procession, piles of home-made bread, basins of
apple-sauce, pickles, potatoes of vast proportion and
mealy beauty. When the ancient and lordly pitcher
of blue and white (whether freighted with new cider
or old cold water need not be told) crowned the
board, the first stage of preparation was complete,
and another portentous pause ensued. The whole
Peabody connection arranged in stately silence in the
front parlor, looked on through the open door in
wonder
and expectation of what was to follow. The
children loitered about the door-ways with watering
eyes and open mouths, like so many innocent little
dragons lying in wait to rush in at an opportune
moment
and bear off their prey.
And now, all at once there comes a deeper hush
a still more portentous pauseall eyes are in the
direction of the kitchen; the children are hanging
forward with their bodies and outstretched necks half
way in at the door; Miriam and the widow stand
breathless and statue-like at either side of the room;
when, as if rising out of some mysterious cave in the
very ground, a dark figure is discerned in the
distance
,
about the centre of the kitchen, (into which
Mopsey has made, to secure an impressive effect, a
grand circuit,) head erect, and bearing before it a
huge platter; all their eyes tell them, every sense
vividly reports what it is the platter supports; she
advances with slow and solemn step; she has crossed
the sill; she has entered the sitting-room; and, with
a full sense of her awful responsibility, Mopsey
delivers
on the table, in a cleared place left for its
careful
deposit, the Thanksgiving turkey.
There is no need now to sound a gong, or to ring
an alarm-bell to make known to that household that
dinner is ready; the brown turkey speaks a
summons
as with the voice of a thousand living gobblers,
and Sylvester rising, the whole Peabody family flock
in. To every one his place is considerately assigned,
the Captain in the centre directly opposite the turkey,
Mrs. Carrack on the other side, the widow at one end,
old Sylvester at the head. The children too, a special
exception being made in their favor to-day, are
allowed
seats with the grown folks, little Sam disposing
himself in great comfort in his old grandsire's arms.
Another hushfor everything to-day moves on
through these constantly shut and opened gates
of silence, in which they all sit tranquil and
speechless
,
when the old patriarch lifts up his aged hands
over the board and repeats his customary grace:
May we all be Christian people the day we die
God bless us.
The Captain, the great knife and fork in hand, was
ready to advance.
Stop a moment, Charley, old Sylvester spoke
up, give us a moment to contemplate the turkey.
I would there were just such a dish, grandfather,
the Captain rejoined, on every table in the land this
day, and if I had my way there would be.
No, no, Charley, the grandfather answered, if
there should be, there would be. There is One who
is wiser than you or I.
It would make the man who would do it, Oliver
suggested, immensely popular: he might get to be
elected President of the United States.
It would cost a large sum, remarked William
Peabody, the merchant.
Let us leave off considering imaginary turkeys,
and discuss the one before us, said old Sylvester,
but I must first put a question, and if it's
answered
with satisfaction, we'll proceed. Now tell me, he
said, addressing himself to Mr. Carrack, who sat in a
sort of dream, as if he had lost his identity, as he
had ever since the night-adventure in the fez-cap and
red silk cloak: Now tell me, Tiffany, although you
have doubtless seen a great many grand things, such
as the Alps, and St. Peter's church at Rome, has
your eye fallen in with anything wherever you
travelled
over the world, grander than that Thanksgiving
turkey?
Mr. Carrack, either from excessive modesty or
total
abstraction, hesitated, looked about him hastily,
and not till the Captain called across the table,
Why don't you speak, my boy? and then, as if
suddenly coming to, and realizing where he was,
answered at last, with great deliberation, It
is
a
fine bird.
Enough said, spoke up old Sylvester cheerfully;
you were the last Peabody I expected to
acknowledge
the merits of the turkey; and, looking
towards
the Captain with encouragement, added, now,
knife and fork, do your duty.
It was short work the jovial Captain made with
the prize turkey; in rapid succession plates were
forwarded
,
heaped, sent around; and with a keen relish
of the Thanksgiving dinner, every head was busy.
Straight on, as people who have an allotted task
before
them, the Peabodys moved through the dinner,
a powerful, steady-going caravan of cheerful
travellers
,
over hill, over dale, up the valleys, along the
stream-side, cropping their way like a nimble-toothed
flock of grazing sheep, keenly enjoying herbage and
beverage by the way.
What though, while they were at the height of its
enjoyment a sudden storm, at that changeful season,
arose without, and dashed its heavy drops against the
doors and window-panes; that only, by the contrast
of security and fire-side comfort, heightened the zest
within, while they were engaged with the many good
dishes at least, but when another pause came, did not
the pelting shower and the chiding wind talk with
them, each one in turn, of the absent, and oh! some
there will not believe itthe lost? It was no doubt
some thought of this kind that prompted old
Sylvester
to speak:
My children, said the patriarch, glancing with a
calm eye around the circle of glowing faces at the
table
you are bound together with good cheer and in
comfortable circumstances; and even as you, who are
here from east and west, from the north and the
south, by each one yielding a little of his individual
whim or inclination, can thus sit together
prosperously
and in peace at one board, so can our glorious
family of friendly States, on this and every other day,
join hands, and like happy children in the fields, lead
a far-lengthening dance of festive peace among the
mountains and among the vales, from the
soft-glimmering
east far on to the bright and ruddy west.
If others still seek to join in
Ay, father, said Oliver, there is a great
danger
.
Even as by making a little way, answered the
patriarch, we could find room at this table for one
or two or three more, so may another State and still
another join us, if it will, and even as our natural
progeny increaseth to the third, fourth, tenth
generation
,
let us trust for centuries to come this happy
Union still shall live to lead her sons to peace,
prosperity
,
and rightful glory.
But, interposed Oliver, the politician, again,
with a double reference in his thoughts, it would
almost
seem, to an erring State or an absent child, one
may break away in wilfulness or crimewhat then?
Let us lure it back, was old Sylvester's reply,
with gentle appeals. Remember we are all
brethren
,
and that our alliance is one not merely of
worldly
interest, but also of family affection. Let us, on
this hallowed day, he added, cherish none but
kindly thoughts toward all our kindred, and if him
we have least esteemed offer the hand, let us take it
in brotherly regard.
There was a pause of silence once again, which was
broken by a knock at the door. Old Sylvester,
having
spoken his mind, had fallen into a reverie, and
the Peabodys glancing one to the other, the question
arose, shall the strangers (Mopsey reported them to
be two) whoever they may be, be admitted?
This is strictly a family festival, it was
suggested
,
where no strangers can be rightly allowed.
May be thieves! the merchant added.
Vagabonds, perhaps! Mrs. Carrack suggested.
Strangers, anyhow! said Mrs. Jane Peabody.
The widow Margaret and Miriam were silent and
gave utterance to no opinion.
In the midst of the discussion old Sylvester
suddenly
awakening, and rearing his white locks aloft, in
the voice of a trumpet of silver sound, cried out:
If they be human, let 'em in!
As he delivered this emphatic order there was a
deep moan at the door, as of one in great pain, or
suffering keenly from anguish of spirit, and when it
was opened to admit the new-comers, the voice of
Chanticleer, raised for the second time, broke in,
clear and shrilly, from the outer darkness.
6
CHAPTER NINTH.
THE NEW-COMERS.
It
was old Sylvester himself who opened the door
and admitted the strangers; one of them, the
younger
,
wore a slouched hat which did not allow his
features
to be distinctly observed, further than that his
eyes were bright with a strange lustre, and that his
face was deadly pale. He was partly supported by
the elder man, whose person was clad in a long coat,
reaching nearly to the ground. They were invited
to the table, but refusing, asked permission to sit at
the fire, which being granted, they took their station
on either side of the hearth; the younger staggered
feebly to his seat, and kept his gaze closely fixed on
the other.
He had better take something, said old
Sylvester
,
looking toward the young man and addressing
the other. Is your young friend ill?
With an ailment food cannot relieve, I fear, the
elder man answered.
Will you not remove your hats? old Sylvester
asked again.
Turning slowly at this question, the young man
answered, We may not prove fit company for such
as you, and if so the event shall prove, we will pass
on and trouble you no further. If every thread were
dry as summer flax, he added, in a tone of deep
feeling
,
I for one, am not fit to sit among honest
people
.
You should not say so, my son, said old
Sylvester
;
let us hope that all men may on a day like
this sit together; that, remembering God's many
mercies
to us all, in the preservation of our lives, in his
blessed change of seasons, in hours of holy
meditation
allowed to us, every man in very gratitude to
the Giver of all Good, for this one day in the year at
least, may suspend all evil thoughts and be at peace
with all his fellow-creatures.
The young man turned toward the company at the
table, but not so far that his whole face could be
seen.
Have all who sit about you at that table, he
asked, glancing slowly around, performed the duty
to which you refer, and purged their bosoms of
unkindness
toward their fellow-men? Is there none
who grasps the widow's substance? who cherishes
scorn and hatred of kindred? Who judges harshly
of the absent?
There was a movement in different members of the
company, but old Sylvester hushed them with a look,
and took upon himself the business of reply.
It may be, said old Sylvester, that some of us
are disquieted, for be it known to you that one of the
children of this household is absent from among us
for causes which may well disturb our thoughts.
I have heard the story, the young man
continued
,
and if I know it aright, these are the truths
of that history: There were two men, friends, once in
this neighborhood, Mr. Barbary the preacher, and
your grandson Elbridge Peabody. Something like a
year ago the preacher suddenly disappeared from this
region, and the report arose and constantly spread
that he had fallen by the hand of his friend, that
grandchild of yours. It began in a cloudy whisper,
afar off, but swelled from day to day, from hour to
hour, till it overshadowed this whole region, and not
the least of the darkness it caused was on this spot,
where this ancient homestead stands, and where
the young man had grown and lived from the hour
of his birth. He saw coldness and avoidance on the
highway; he was shrunk from on sabbath-mornings,
and by children; but this was little and could be
bornethe world was against him: but when he
saw an aged face averted, he looked at old Sylvester
steadily, and a mother's countenance sad and
hostile
Sadbut not hostile, the widow murmured.
Sorrowful and troubled, at least, the young man
rejoined, his life, for all of happiness, was at an
end. He must cease to live or he must restore the
ancient sunshine which had lighted the windows of
the home of his boyhood. He knew that his friend
had
not
fallen by his hand; that he still lived, but in
a far distant place which none but a long and weary
journey could reach.
He should have declared as much, interposed
the old patriarch.
No, sir; his word would have been but as the
frail leaf blown idly from the autumn-bough; nothing
but the living presence of his friend could silence the
voice of the accuser. He rose up and departed,
without
counsel of any, trusting only in God and his own
strength; he bore with him neither bag nor baggage,
scrip nor scrippagenot even a change of raiment;
but with a handful of fruit and the humble provision
which his good mother had furnished for the
harvest-field
,
he set forth; day and night he journeyed on
the track he knew his friend had taken to that far
country, toiling in the fields to secure food and
lodging
for the night, and some scant aids to carry him
from place to place. Pushing on fast and far through
the western country, in hunger and distress, passing
by the very door of prosperous kinsfolk, but not
tarrying
a moment to seek relief.
At this point Mrs. Jane Peabody glanced at her
husband.
And so by one stage and another, hastening on,
he reached that great city in the south, the
metropolis
of New Orleans; often, as he hoped, on the very
steps of his friend, but never overtaking him, with
fortune at so low an ebb that there he was well-nigh
wasted in strength, hunger-stricken, and tattered in
dress; driven to live in hovels till some chance
restored
him the little means to advance; so mean of
person that his dearest friend, his nearest kinsman,
even his old playfellow there, pointing to Mr.
Tiffany
Carrack, who had wrestled with him in the
hayfield, who had sat with him in childish talk often
and many a time by summer stream-sides, would have
passed him by as one unknown.
The glance which, in speaking this, he directed at
Mr. Carrack, kindled on that young gentleman's
countenance
a ruby glow, so intense and fiery that it
would seem as if it must have burned up the tawny
tufts before their very eyes, like so much dry
stubble
.
There was a glow of another kind in the
Captain's
broad face, which shone like another sun as
he contemplated the two young men, glancing from
one to the other.
The young man, bent on that one purpose as on
life itself, he continued, silencing his companion,
who seemed eager to speak, with a motion of his
finger
,
through towns, over waters, upon deserts, still
pursued his way; and, to be brief in a weary history,
there, in the very heart of that great region of gold,
among diggers and searchers, and men distracted in
a thousand ways in that perilous hunt, to find his
simple-hearted
friend, the preacher, in an out-of-the-way
wilderness among the mountains, exhorting the
living
,
comforting the sick, consoling the dyingand
then, for the first time he learned, what his friend
had carefully concealed before, the motive of his
self-banishment
to this distant country.
His companion would have spoken, but the young
man hurrying on, allowed him not a word.
You who know his history, he continued,
addressing
the company at the tableknow what calamity
had once come upon the household of Mr. Barbary, by
the unlawful thirst for gold; that he held its love as
the curse of curses; he thought if he could but once
throw himself in its midst, where that passion raged
the most, he would be doing his Master's service most
faithfully, more than in this quiet country-place of
peaceful households, but when he learned the peril
and the sore distress of his young friend, he tarried
not a moment. `To restore peace to one injured
mind,' he said; `to bring back harmony to one
household is a clear and certain duty which will
out-weigh
the vague chances of the good I may do here.'
The young man cherished but one wish; through
storm and trial and distress of every name and hue,
if he could but reach home on the day of
Thanksgiving
,
and stand up there before his assembled
kindred
a vindicated man, he would be requited fully
for all his toil. He took ship; in tempest, and with
many risks of perishing far away unvindicated, in the
middle of the wild sea
The widowed mother could restrain herself no
longer, but rushing forward, she removed the young
man's hat from his brow, parted his locks, and
casting
herself upon his neck, gave utterance to her
feelings
in the affecting language of Scripture, which she
had listened to in the morning: My son was dead
and is alive againhe was lost and is found!
Miriam timidly grasped his offered hand and was
silent. The company had risen from the table and
gathered around.
Now, said William Peabody, I could believe,
be glad to believe all this, if he had but brought
Mr. Barbary with him.
The elder stranger cast back his coat, removed his
hat, and standing forth, said, I am here, and testify
to the truth, in every word, of all my young friend
has declared to you.
On this declaration the Peabodys, without an
exception
,
hastened to welcome and address the
returned
Elbridge, and closed upon him in a solid group
of affectionate acknowledgment. Old Sylvester stood
6*
looking loftily down over all from the outer edge of
the circle, and while they were busiest in
congratulations
and well-wishes, he went forward.
Stand back! cried the old man, waving the
company
aside with outspread arms, and advancing with
extended hand toward his grandson. I have an
atonement to render here, which I call you all to
witness.
I take your hand, grandfather, Elbridge
interposed
,
but not in acknowledgment of any wrong on
your part. You have lived an hundred blameless
years, and I am not the one this day to breathe a
reproach
for the first time on your spotless age.
Tears filled the old patriarch's eyes, and with a
gentle hand he led his grandson silently to the table,
to which the whole company returned, there being
room for Mr. Barbary as well.
At this crisis of triumphant explanation, Mopsey,
who had under one pretext and another, evaded the
bringing in of the pie to the last moment, appeared
at the kitchen-door bearing before her, with that air
of extraordinary importance peculiar to the negro
countenance on eventful occasions, a huge brown dish
with which she advanced to the head of the table,
and with an emphatic bump, answering to the pithy
speeches of warriors and statesmen at critical moments,
deposited the great Thanksgiving pumpkin pie.
Looking
proudly around, she simply said, Dere!
It was the blossom and crown of Mopsey's life,
the setting down and full delivery to the family of
that, the greatest pumpkin-pie ever baked in that
house from the greatest pumpkin ever reared among
the Peabodys in all her long backward recollection
of past Thanksgivings, and her manner of setting it
down, was, in its most defiant form, a clincher and a
challenge to all makers and bakers of pumpkin-pies,
to all cutters and carvers, to all diners and eaters,
to all friends and enemies of pumpkin-pie, in the
thirty or forty United States. The Brundages too,
might come and look at it if they had a mind to!
The Peabody family, familiar with the pie from
earliest infancy, were struck dumb, and sat silent for
the space of a minute, contemplating its vastness and
beauty. Old Sylvester even, with his hundred years
of pumpkin-pie experience, was staggered, and little
Sam jumped up and clapped his hands in his old
grandfather's arms, and struggled to stretch himself
across as if he would appropriate it, by actual
possession
,
to himself. The joy of the Peabodys was
complete
,
for the lost grandson had returned, and the
Thanksgiving-pie was a glorious one, and if it was
the largest share that was allotted to the returned
Elbridge, will any one complain? And yet at times
a cloud came upon the young man's brow,when
dinner was passed with pleasant family talk,
questionings
and experiences, as they sat about the old
homestead
hearth,which even the playful gambols of the
children who sported about him like so many
friendly
spirits, could not drive away. The heart of cousin
Elbridge was not in their childish freaks and fancies
as it had been in other days. The shining solitude
looking in at the windows seemed to call him
without
.
As though it had caught something of the genial
spirit that glowed within the house, the wind was
laid without, and the night softened with the beauty
of the rising moon. With a sadness on his brow
which neither the old homestead nor the pure
heavens
cast there, Elbridge went forth into the calm
night, and sitting for a while by the road beneath an
ancient locust-tree, where he had often read his book
in the summer-times of boyhood, he communed with
himself. He was happywhat mortal man could be
happier?in all his wishes come to pass; his very
dreams had taken life and proved to be realities and
friends, and yet a sadness he could not drive away
followed his steps. Why was this? That moment,
if his voice or any honorable and sinless motion of his
hand could have ordained it, he would have
dismissed
himself from life and ceased to be a living
partaker
in the scenes about him. Even thenfor happy
as he was, he dreaded in prophetic fear, the chances
which beset our mortal path. The weight of
mortality
was heavy upon the young man's spirit.
Thinking over all the way he had passed, oh, who
could answer that he, with the thronging company
of busy passions and desires, could ever hope to
reach an old age and never go astray? Oh, blessed
is he (he thought) who can lie down in death, can
close his account with this world, having safely
escaped the temptations, the crimes, the trials, which
make of good men even, in moments of weakness and
misjudgment, the false speaker, the evil-doer, the
slanderer, the coward, the hasty assailant, and, (oh,
dreadful perchance,) the seeming-guilty-murderer
himself. Strange thoughts for a prosperous lover's
night, but earth is not heaven. With the sweat of
anguish on his brow he bowed his head as one whose
trouble is heavy to be borne. Yet even then the
thought of the sweet heaven over him, with all its
glorious promises, came upon him, and as he lifted up
his eyes from the earth, the moon sailing forth from
the clouds, and flooding the region with silver light,
disclosed a figure so gentle and delicate, and in its
features so pure of all our common passions, it seemed
as if his troubled thoughts had summoned a spirit
before
him from the better world. As he stood
regarding
it in melancholy calmness, it extended towards
him a hand.
No, no, he said, declining the gentle salutation
and retiring a pace, touch me not, Miriam, I am not
worthy of your pure companionship. If you knew
what passed and is passing in my breast, you would
loathe me as a leper.
She was silent and dropped her eyes before him.
Think not, my gentle mistress, he added
presently
,
my heart is changed towards you. The
glow is only too bright and warm.
If you love me not, Elbridge, she interposed
quickly, fear not to say so, even now. I will bear
the pang as best I can.
You have suffered too much already, he
rejoined
,
touched to the heart. My long silence must
have been as death to one so kind and gentle.
I have suffered, was all she said. One word
from you in your long absence would have made me
happy.
It would, I know it would, and yet I could not
speak it, Elbridge replied. When, with a blight
upon my name I left those halls, pointing to the old
homestead standing in shadow of the autumn trees,
I vowed to know them no more, that my step
should never cross their threshold, that my voice
should never be heard again in those ancient
chambers
,
that no being of all that household should have
a word from these lips or hands till I could come
back a vindicated man; that I would perish in distant
lands, find a silent grave among strangers, far from
mother and her I loved, or that I would come back
with my lost friend, in his living form, to avouch and
testify my truth and innocence.
And had you no thought of me in that cruel
absence
,
dear Elbridge? asked Miriam.
Of you! he echoed, now taking her hand, of
you! When in all these my wanderings, in weary
nights, in lonely days, on seas and deserts far away,
sore of foot and sick at heart, making my couch
beneath
the stars, in the tents of savage men, in the
shadow of steeples that know not our holy faith, was
it not my religion and my only solace, that one like
you thought of me as I of her, and though all the
world abandoned and distrusted the wanderer, there
was one star in the distant horizon which yet shone
true, and trembled with a hopeful light upon my
path.
Are we not each other's now? she whispered
softly as she lay her gentle head upon his bosom;
and if we have erred, and repent but truly, will not
He forgive us?
As she lifted up her innocent face to heaven, did
not those gentle tears which fell unheard by mortal
ear, from those fair eyes, drop in hearing of Him who
hears and acknowledges the faintest sound of true
affection, through all the boundless universe,
musically
as the chime of holy Sabbath-bells?
You are my dear wife, he answered, folding her
close to his heart, and if you forgive and still
cherish
me, happiness may still be ours; and although
no formal voice has yet called us one, by all that's
sacred in the stillness of the night, and by every
honest beating of this heart, dear Miriam, you are
mine, to watch, to tend, to love, to reverence, in
sickness
,
in sorrow, in care, in joy; by all that belongs of
gaiety to youth, in manhood and in age, we will have
one home, one couch, one fireside, one grave, one God,
and one hereafter.
An old familiar instrument, swept as he well knew
by his mother's fingers, sounded at that moment from
the homestead, and hand in hand, blending their
steps, they returned to the Thanksgiving household
within.
CHAPTER TENTH.
THE CONCLUSION.
When
Elbridge and Miriam re-entered the
homestead
they found the best parlor, which they had left
in humble dependence on the light of a single
home-made
wick, now in full glow, and wide awake in
every corner, with a perfect illumination of lamps and
candles; and every thing in the room had waked up
with them. The old brass andirons stood shining like
a couple of bare-headed little grandfathers by the
hearth; the letters in the sampler over the mantel,
narrating the ages of the family, had renewed their
color; the tall old clock, allowed to speak again,
stood like an overgrown schoolboy with his face
newly washed, stretching himself up in a corner;
the painted robins and partridges on the wall,
now in full feather, strutting and flying about in all
the glory of an unfading plumage; and at the rear
of all the huge back-log on the hearth glowed and
rolled in his place as happy as an alderman at a city
feast. The Peabodys too, partook of the new
illumination
,
and were there in their best looks, scattered
about the room in cheerful groups, while in the midst
of all the widow Margaret, her face lighted with a
smile which came there from far-off years, holding in
her hand as we see an angel in the sunny clouds in
old pictures, the ancient harpsichord, which till now
had been laid away and out of use for many a long
day of sadness.
While Elbridge and Miriam stood still in wonder
at the sudden change of this living pageant, old
Sylvester, his white head carried proudly aloft,
appeared
from the sitting-room with Mr. Barbary, a
quaint figure, freed now of his long coat, and bearing
no trace of travel on his neat apparel and face of
cheerful gravity. Leaving the preacher in the centre
of the apartment, the patriarch advanced quietly
toward
the young couple, and, addressing himself to
Elbridge, said, My children, I have a favor to ask
of you.
Anything, grandfather! Elbridge answered
promptly.
You are sure? Old Sylvester's eyes twinkled as
he spoke.
It would be the pleasure and glory of my young
days, Elbridge answered again, to crown your
noble
old age, grandfather, with any worthy wreath
these hands could fashion, and not call it a favor
either.
Old Sylvester, smiling from one to the other, said,
You are to be married immediately.
The young couple fell back and dropped each the
other's hand, which they had been holding. Miriam
trembled and shrunk the farthest away.
You will not deny me? the grandfather said
again. You are the youngest and the last whom I
can hope to see joined in that bond which is to
continue
our name and race; it is my last request on
earth.
At these simple words, turning, and with a fond
regard which spoke all their thoughts, Miriam and
Elbridge took again each the other's hand, and drew
close side to side. The company rose, and Mr.
Barbary
was on the point of speaking when there
emerged upon the family scene, from an inner
chamber
,
as though he had been a foreigner entering a
fashionable
drawing-room, Mr. Tiffany Carrack, in the
very blossom of full dress; his hair in glossy curl,
with white neckcloth and waistcoat of the latest cut
and tie, coat and pants of the purest model, pumps and
silk stockings; bearing in his hand a gossamer
pocket-handkerchief
,
which he shook daintily as he
advanced
,
and filled the room with a strange fragrance.
With mincing step, just dotting the ground, his whole
body shaking like a delicate structure in danger
every moment of tumbling to the ground, he
advanced
to where Miriam and Elbridge stood before
Mr. Barbary.
Why really, 'pon my life and honor, Miriam, you
are looking quite charming this evening!
She should look so now if ever, Tiffany, said
old Sylvester, for she is just about to be married to
your cousin Elbridge.
Now you don't mean that? said Mr. Tiffany,
touching the tawny tufts tenderly with his perfumed
pocket-handkerchief, Oh, woman! woman! what
is your name? He hesitated for a reply.
Perfidy? suggested Mr. Oliver Peabody.
Yes, that's it. Have I lived to look on this,
Mr. Tiffany continued; to have my young hopes
blighted, the rose of my existence cropped, and all
that. Is it for this, addressing Miriam directly: he
had been talking before to the air: Is it for this I
went blackberrying with you in my tender infancy!
Is it for this that in the heyday of youth I walked
with you to the school-house down the road! Was
it for this that in the prime of manhood I breathed
soft music in your ear at the witching time of night!
As he arrived at this last question, Mopsey, in her
new gown of gorgeous pattern, and, having laid
aside her customary broad-bordered cap, with a high
crowned turban of red, and yellow cotton
handkerchief
on her head, appeared at the parlor door. Mr.
Tiffany paused: he saw the Moorish princess before
him; rallying, however, he was proceeding to
describe
himself as a friendly troubadour, whose
affection
had been responded to, when the Captain
placing
his mouth to his ear, as in confidence, uttered in
a portentous whisper, THE VAT!
Mr. Tiffany immediately lost all joint and strength,
subsided into a chair at a distance, and from that
moment looked upon the scene like one in a trance.
After all, said Mr. Oliver, glancing at him, I
don't see just now that, in any point of view, this
young gentleman
is
destined to carry the principles
of free governmentanywhere.
The family being now all gathered, Mr. Barbary
proceeded, employing a simple and impressive form
in use in that family from its earliest history:
You, the Bridegroom and the Bride, who now
present yourselves candidates of the covenant of God
and of your marriage before him, in token of your
consenting affections and united hearts, please to give
your hands to one another.
Mr. Bridegroom, the person whom you now take
by the hand, you receive to be your married wife:
you promise to love her, to honor her, to support her,
and in all things to treat her as you are now, or shall
hereafter be convinced is by the laws of Christ made
your duty,a tender husband, with unspotted
fidelity
till death shall separate you.
Mrs. Bride, the person whom you now hold by
the hand you accept to be your married husband;
you promise to love him, to honor him, to submit to
him, and in all things to treat him as you are now
or shall hereafter be convinced, is by the laws of
Christ made your duty,an affectionate wife, with
inviolable loyalty till death shall separate you.
This solemn covenant you make, and in this
sacred
oath bind your souls in the presence of the Great
God, and before these witnesses.
I then declare you to be husband and wife
regularly
married according to the laws of God and the
Commonwealth: therefore what God hath thus
joined
together let no man put asunder.
When these words had been solemnly spoken the
widow Margaret struck her ancient harpsichord in an
old familiar tune of plaintive tenderness, and the
young bridegroom holding Miriam's hand in an
affectionate
clasp, answered the music with a little hymn
or carol, often used before among the Peabodys on a
like occasion:
Entreat me notI ne'er will leave thee,
Ne'er loose this hand in bower or hall;
This heart, this heart shall ne'er deceive thee,
This voice shall answer ever to thy call.
To which Miriam, after a brief pause of hesitation,
in that tone of chanting lament familiar to her,
answered
Thy God is mine, where'er thou rovest,
Where'er thou dwellest there too will I dwell;
In the same grave shall she thou lovest
Lie down with him she loves so well.
Like a cheerful voice answering to these, and
wishing
,
out of the mysterious darkness of night, all
happiness
and prosperity to the young couple, the silver
call of Chanticleer arose without, renewed and
renewed
again, as if he could never tire of announcing the
happy union to all the country round.
And now enjoyment was at its height among the
Peabodys, helped by Plenty, who, with Mopsey for
chief assistant, hurried in, with plates of shining
pippins
,
baskets of nuts, brown jugs of new cider of
home-made vintage; Mrs. Carrack, who had selected
the simplest garment in her wardrobe, moving about
in aid of black Mopsey, tendering refreshment to her
old father first, and Mrs. Jane Peabody insisting on
being allowed to distribute the walnuts with her own
hand.
The children, never at rest for a moment, frisked to
and fro, like so many merry dolphins, disporting in
the unaccustomed candle-light, to which they were
commonly strangers. They were listened to in all
their childish prattle kindly, by every one, indulged
in all their little foolish ways, as if the grown-up
Peabodys
for this night at least, believed that they were
indeed little citizens of the kingdom of heaven,
straying
7
about this wicked world on parole. Uncle Oliver,
once, spreading his great Declaration-of-Independence
pocket-handkerchief on his knees, attempted to put
them to the question as to their learning. They all
recognised
Dr. Franklin, with his spectacles thrown up on
his brow, among the signers, but denying all
knowledge
of anything more, ran away to the Captain,
who was busy building, a dozen at a time, paper
packet ships, and launching them upon the table for
a sea.
In the very midst of the mirthful hubbub old
Sylvester
called Robert and William to his side, and was
heard to whisper, Bring 'em in. William and
Robert
were gone a moment and returned, bearing
under
heavy head-way, tumbling and pitching on one
side constantly, two ancient spinning wheels, Mopsey
following with snowy flocks of wool and
spinning
sticks. Old Sylvester arose, and delivering a
stick and flock to Mrs. Carrack and Mrs. Jane
Peabody
,
requested them, in a mild voice and as a
matter
of course already settled, to begin. A
spinning-match
!
Yes, anything you choose to-night, father.
Rolling back their sleeves, adjusting their gowns,
the wheels being planted on either side of the
fire-place
,
Mrs. Jane and Mrs. Carrack, stick in hand,
seized each on her allotment of wool, and sent the
wheels whirling. It was a cheerful sight to see the
two matrons closing in upon the wheel, retiring,
closing in againwhose wheel is swiftest, whose
thread truest? Now Mrs. Janenow Mrs. Carrack.
If either, Mrs. Carrack puts the most heart in her
work.
Now
she looks like my Nancy, said old
Sylvester
in a glow, as when she used to spin and sing,
in the old upper chamber.
Away they gowhose thread is swiftest, whose
thread the truest now?
While swift and free the contest wages, the
parlor-door
standing open, and beyond that the door of
the sitting-room, look down the long perspective!
Do you not see in the twilight of the kitchen fire a
dark head, lighting up, as in flashes, with a glittering
row of teeth, with a violent agitation of the body,
with gusty ha-ha's, and fragments of an uproarious
chant flying through the door something to this
effect
Oh, de fine ladies, how dey do spinspinspin,
Like de gals long agolong ago!
I bet to'der one don't winwinwin,
Kase de diamond-flowers on her fingers grow.
Lay down your white gloves, take up de wool,
Round about de whirly wheel go;
Back'ard and for'ard nimble feet pull,
Like de nice gals longlong ago!
Silence follows, in which nothing is observable
from that quarter more than a great pair of white
eyes rolling about in the partial darkness. Who
was other than pleased that in spite of Mopsey's
decision, old Sylvester determined that if either, Mrs.
Carrack's work was done a little the soonest, and
that her thread was a little the truest?
During the contest the old merchant and his wife
had conversed closely, apart; the green shade had
lost its terrors, and he could look on it steadily, now;
and at the close William Peabody approaching the
fire-place
,
drew from his bosom the old parchment deed,
which in his hunger for money had so often
disquieted
his visits to the homestead, and thrust it into the
very heart of the flame, which soon shrivelled it up,
and, conveying it out at the chimney, before the night
was past spread it in peaceful ashes over the very
grounds which it had so long disturbed.
So much for that! said the old merchant, as the
last flake vanished; and now, nephew, he
addressed
himself to Elbridge, fulfilling an engagement
connected with your return, I resign to you all charge
of your father's property.
Did you bring anything with you from the Gold
Region? Mrs. Carrack interposed.
Not one cent, Aunt, Elbridge answered
promptly
.
You may add, William, pursued Mrs. Carrack,
the sums of mine you have in hand.
William Peabody was pausing on this proposition,
the sums in question being at that very moment
embarked in a most profitable speculation.
Upon the very height of the festivity, when it
glowed the brightest and was most musical with
mirthful
voices, there had come to the casement a
moaning
sound as if borne upon the wind from a distance,
a wailing of anguish, at the same time like and
unlike
that of human suffering. By slow advances it
approached nearer and nearer to the homestead, and
whenever it arose it brought the family enjoyment to
a momentary pause. It had drawn so near that it
sounded now again, as if in mournful lamentation, at
the very door, when Mopsey, her dark face almost
white, and her brow wrinkled with anxiety, rushed
in. Grandfather, she said, addressing old
Sylvester
,
blind Sorrel's dying in the door-yard.
There was not one in all that company whom the
announcement did not cause to start; led by old
Sylvester
,
they hastily rose, and conducted by Mopsey,
followed to the scene. Blind Sorrel was lying by the
moss-grown horse-trough, at the gate.
I noticed her through the day, said Oliver,
wandering up the lane as if she was seeking the
house.
The death-agony must have been upon her then,
said William Peabody, shading his eyes with his
hand.
She remembered, perhaps, her young days, old
Sylvester added, when she used to crop the
door-yard
grass.
Mopsey, in her solicitude to have the death-bed of
poor blind Sorrel properly attended, had brought
with her, in the event of the paling or obscuration
of the moon, a dark lantern, which she held tenderly
aside as though the poor old creature still possessed
her sight; immoveable herself as though she had
been a swarthy image in stone, while, on the other
side, William Peabody, near her head, stood gazing
upon the animal with a fixed intensity, breathing
hard and watching her dying struggle with a rigid
steadiness of feature almost painful to behold.
Has carried me to mill many a day, he said;
some pleasantest hours of my life spent upon her
back, sauntering along at early day.
Your mother rode her to meeting, Sylvester
addressed his second son, on your wedding-day,
Oliver. Sorrel was of a long-lived race.
She was the gentlest horse-creature you ever
owned, father, added Mrs. Carrack, turning
affectionately
toward old Sylvester, and humored us
girls when we rode her as though she had been a
blood-relation.
I'm not so sure of that, Mr. Tiffany Carrack
rejoined
,
for she has dumped me in a ditch more
than once.
That was your own careless riding, Tiffany, said
the Captain, I don't believe she had the least
ill-will
towards any living creature, man or beast.
It was observed that whenever William Peabody
spoke, blind Sorrel turned her feeble head in that
direction
,
as if she recognised and singled out his voice
from all the others.
She knows your voice, father, even in her
darkness
,
said the Captain, as the sailor tells his old
captain's step on deck at night.
Well she may, Charles, the merchant replied,
for she was foaled the same day I was born.
The old creature moaned and heaved her side
fainter and fainter.
Speak to her, William, said the old grandfather.
William Peabody bent down, and in a tremulous
voice said, Sorrel, do you know me?
The poor blind creature lifted up her aged head
feebly towards him, heaved her weary side, gasped
once and was gone. The moon, which had been
shining with a clear and level light upon the group
of faces, dipped at that moment behind the
orchard-trees
,
and at the same instant the light in the
lantern flickering feebly, was extinguished.
What do you mean by putting the light out,
Mopsey, old Sylvester asked.
I knew de old lamp would be goin' out, Massa,
soon as ever blind Sorrel die; I tremble so I do' no
what I'm saying. It was poor Mopsey's agitation
which had shaken out the light.
Never shall we know a more faithful servant,
a truer friend, than poor blind Sorrel, they all agreed;
and bound still closer together by so simple a bond
as common sympathy in the death of the poor old
blind family horse, they returned within the
homestead
.
They were scarcely seated again when William
Peabody
,
turning to Mrs. Carrack, said, Certainly!
referring to the transfer of the money of hers in his
hands on loan, to Elbridge, he will need some
ready money to begin the world with.
All was cheerful friendship now; the family,
reconciled
in all its members, sitting about their aged
father's hearth on this glorious Thanksgiving night;
the gayer mood subsiding, a sudden stillness fell upon
the whole house, such as precedes some new turn in
the discourse.
Old Sylvester Peabody sat in the centre of the
family, moving his body to and fro gently, and lifting
his white head up and down upon his breast; his
whole look and manner strongly arresting the
attention
of all; of the children not the least. After a
while the old man paused, and looking mildly about,
addressed the household.
This is a happy day, my children, he said, but
the seeds of it were sown, you must allow an old man
to say, long, long ago. If one good Being had not
died in a far country and a very distant time, we
could not have this comfort now.
The children watched the old grandfather more
closely.
I am an old man, and shall be with you, I feel,
but for a little while yet; as one who stands at the
gate of the world to come, looking through, and
through which he is soon to pass, will you not allow
me to believe that I thought of the hopes of your
immortal spirits in your youth?
As being the eldest, and answering for the rest,
William Peabody replied, We will.
Did I not teach you then, or strive my best to
teach, that there was but one Holy God?
You did, fatheryou did! the widow Margaret
answered.
That his only Son died for us?
Oftenoften! said Mrs. Carrack.
That we must love one another as brethren?
At morning and night, in winter and summer;
by the hearth and in the field, you did, Oliver
rejoined
.
That there is but one path to happiness and
peace here and hereafter, he continued, through
the performance of our duty towards our Maker, and
our fellow men of every name, and tongue, and
clime, and color? to love your dear Native Land, as
she sits happy among the nations, but to remember
this, our natural home, is but the ground-nest and
cradle from which we spread our wings to fly through
all the earth with hope and kindly wishes for all men.
If the air is cheerful here, and the sun-light pleasant,
let no barrier or wall shut it in, but pray God, with
reverent hope, it spread hence to the farthest lands
and seas, till all the people of the earth are lighted up
and made glad in the common fellowship of our
blessed Saviour, who is, was, and will be evermore
to all men guide, protector, and ensample. May He
be so to us and ours, to our beloved home and happy
Fatherland, in all the time to come!
The old man bowed his head in presence of his
reconciled
household, and fell into a sweet slumber;
not one of all that company but echoed the old man's
prayerMay he be so to us and ours, to our
beloved
Home and happy Fatherland in all the time
to come!
On this, on every day of Thanksgiving and Praise,
be that old man's blessed prayer in all quarters,
among all classes and kindred, everywhere repeated:
May He be so to us and ours, to our beloved Home
and happy Fatherland in all the time to come!
And when, like that good old man, we come to
bow our heads at the close of a long, long life, may
we, like him, fall into a gentle sleep, conscious that
we have done the work of charity, and spread about
our path, wherever it lead, peace and good-will
among men!
THE END.